













Juan Ramón Alaix | Zoetis | Zoetis 




























 







Zoetis.com uses cookies to improve your experience when browsing our website. By continuing to use this site, you are agreeing to their use. To find out more, view our cookie policy. 


Agree











































About UsZoetis at a Glance
Vision & Mission
Core Beliefs
Awards & Recognition
History
Zoetis Executive TeamBoard Committees & Charters
Board of Directors
Contact Our Directors

Corporate GovernancePolicies & Procedures
Board Committees & Charters
Board of Directors
Contact Our Directors

Corporate Compliance
Company Locations







Home / About Us / Zoetis Executive Team / Zoetis Executive Team 



Share
Share on twitter
Share on facebook
Share on linkedin
Share on google_plusone_share
Share on email





Print





Text Size







Next >



Zoetis Executive Team


Juan Ramón Alaix




Chief Executive Officer






Juan Ramón Alaix is Chief Executive Officer of Zoetis. In this role, he leads the world's leading animal health company with a singular focus on animal health medicines and vaccines, complemented by diagnostic products, genetic tests, biodevices and a range of services. In addition, he is a member of the Zoetis Board of Directors. Under his leadership, the company generated annual revenue of $4.9 billion in 2016 with approximately 9,000 employees worldwide.
Mr. Alaix has 35 years’ experience of increasing responsibility in finance, sales and management, including 20 years in the pharmaceutical industry. Prior to Zoetis, he served as President of Pfizer Animal Health since 2006, where he was responsible for the overall strategic direction and financial performance of the company. Mr. Alaix joined Pfizer from Pharmacia in 2003 as regional president. In the 1990s, he served in general management with Rhône-Poulenc Rorer in Spain and Belgium before becoming country president of Spain for Pharmacia in 1998.
In 2013, Mr. Alaix completed a two-year term as President of the International Federation for Animal Health (IFAH), now known as HealthforAnimals, in addition to serving as a member of the board and executive committee. HealthforAnimals represents manufacturers of veterinary medicines, vaccines and other animal health products in both developed and emerging markets. Hecontinues to serve as a member of the HealthforAnimals board and executive committee.
A native of Spain, Mr. Alaix received a graduate degree in economics from the Universidad de Madrid.










About Us
See Zoetis at a glance.More











                Select a Country

zoetis.com
zoetisZO.com



Argentina
Australia
Austria
Belgium (French)
Belgium (Dutch)
Brazil
Bolivia
Bulgaria
Canada
Chile
China
Colombia
Costa Rica
Croatia
Czech Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Greece
Hungary
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Japan
Latvia
Lithuania
Malaysia
Mexico
Morocco
Netherlands
New Zealand
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Russia
Serbia
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
Ukraine
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Vietnam
 You are leaving the country website to access another site in the group.
Regulatory constraints and medical practices vary from country to country. Consequently, the information provided on the site in which you enter may not be suitable for use in your country. 






Home

|Sitemap

|Privacy Policy

|Cookie Policy

|Terms of Use























Juan Ramón Alaix – Hispanic Executive





















 

 














Menu



Close



Search



Expand



Collapse



Previous



Next



RSS Feed



LinkedIn



Twitter



Facebook



Email



Guerrero Howe



























Hispanic Executive







Search







Search for:



Search






Juan Ramón Alaix


CEO Juan Ramón Alaix  rings the opening bell on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange in celebration of Zoetis’s IPO. 

 “I don’t see restrictions in this country, I see opportunities. If you show education, experience, and ambition, then you are well positioned for success.”
March 17, 2014


			By			Zach Baliva






Life in a new city is difficult, especially if you root for its rival. Juan Ramón Alaix should know. He moved from Barcelona to Madrid at age 10 but couldn’t bring himself to support Real Madrid Club de Fútbol when his heart was with Fútbol Club Barcelona. The two foes battle on the pitch in matches known as El Clásico. Their rivalry has become one of the fiercest in global professional sports.
While soccer loyalties may seem trivial in the world of international business, the lessons learned at an early age have helped Alaix, CEO of Zoetis, become one of the top Hispanic CEOs in the United States. “Moving to Madrid and starting over taught me to adapt and interact in a new and different environment,” he explains. “That’s been an important skill to have many, many times in my career.”

Alaix graduated from university and started working in Spain when a position at Rhone-Poulenc as the international company’s general manager took him to Belgium in 1996. He discovered relocating was easier the second time around. “After you’ve lived and worked in a place that’s new to you, it’s not as overwhelming to do it again,” Alaix says. He returned to Spain to serve as president of Pharmacia’s operations. When Pfizer acquired Pharmacia in 2003, the company asked Alaix to relocate to the United States and assume a regional role for his new company.
The move was more than a physical one, as Alaix found himself with a host of new professional responsibilities that he would have to master, while adjusting to a new company, a new culture, and a new language. He went from managing work in Spain to managing all regional business functions for parts of Europe from the United States.
In 2012, Pfizer decided to separate Zoetis, once known as Pfizer Animal Health, into an independent company. The move, completed in June of 2013 after a successful IPO, formed a fully independent company. With 9,300 employees worldwide and products and services sold in 120 markets, Zoetis is the largest animal-health company in the world. It performs research and provides veterinary medicines, vaccines, and other animal-related services.
Zoetis generated $4.3 billion in yearly revenues in 2012 through a three-tiered model. First, the company interacts directly with customers, developing strong relationships through the industry’s premier sales force. Second, it continues to innovate with new products across eight species of animals and in five therapeutic areas. Lastly, Zoetis provides the most reliable, high-quality manufacturing supply in the industry.
Today, Alaix says one of his most important functions is to guide the company through its post-Pfizer era by creating a new corporate DNA and company culture. That process begins in the corporate boardroom. Zoetis’s board was formed by appointing three independent members and five members from parent Pfizer. Then, when Pfizer divested its remaining stake in Zoetis, three new board members replaced the Pfizer executives. One leader from Pfizer stayed, and other positions may still be filled. Alaix and other members worked together through a comprehensive interview process to find candidates from various industries and backgrounds. “We wanted to locate people with expertise in business and finance, as well as someone who brings science and experience in animal health,” Alaix says. “We wanted diversity and looked for people with a good combination of experience and expertise.” Forming the initial board was especially important, because Alaix and his partners were establishing the foundation of Zoetis.
Together, the board and company executives are helping Zoetis find its way apart from Pfizer. “Pfizer has their unique needs and we have ours,” Alaix says. “We serve different species, different needs, and different customers. A lot of what we do should be different.” The company aspires for its people and products to be the most valued by animal-health customers around the world and is establishing a strong foundation by meeting its financial commitments and working to communicate its new identity.
With that important work underway, Alaix can focus on what he does best—leading. He likes to arrive at his New Jersey office before the clock strikes seven. The habit allows him to avoid traffic and review the previous day’s business before starting on new projects. He also uses the hour to make phone calls to Zoetis’s offices in Europe in Asia, where the time difference is between 6 and 12 hours. Staying connected to its operations in 70 countries outside of the United States is important, and Alaix says he spends 35 percent of his time travelling.

Juan Ramón Alaix’s
Formula for Success
You need to work hard no matter who you are or what position you hold. Embrace change and see every new task, position, or project as a chance to grow.

Delegation is crucial in such a large organization, but he likes to stay connected, saying “I don’t believe in micromanaging every aspect, because people should be competent and accountable, but I also like to teach so that each person understands how their choices impact the full organization.”
Alaix is a past president and current board member of the International Federation for Animal Health (IFAH). He serves on the executive committee to help the group promote and communicate the value that animal health companies bring to society. He says IFAH looks to support innovation, navigate regulations, and interact in public policy issues.
While many leaders in corporate America see major obstacles for Latinos in business, Alaix says his global perspective and personal experiences give him a different perspective. “I don’t see restrictions in this country, I see opportunities,” he says. “If you show education, experience, and ambition, then you are well positioned for success.” Zoetis, for example, has a C-suite filled by people from various geographies, including Colombia.
Like the young boy who rooted for Fútbol Club Barcelona in the middle of Madrid, Alaix says aspiring professionals need to be flexible while retaining who they are. Horizontal movement can be important for professional development, adaptability is important, and global experience is crucial in the “shrinking” world of international business.
To get to know the other ‘Best of the Boardroom’ leaders, click here.




In This Issue


 
Darren Rebelez



 
Citibank Gets Serious About Reinvestment



 
Making Medicine Tech Savvy



 
The  Silent Partner






You Might Also Like



 
Cultural Connoisseur



 
The Uplifter



 
MassMutual Implements Strategy with Impact



 
Building Bridges Across Cultures Reception




































Juan Ramón Alaix | Business Roundtable
 













































Skip to main content







Contact

General Inquiries202.872.1260info@brt.org
Mailing Address300 New Jersey Avenue, NWSuite 800Washington, D.C. 20001
Media ContactRayna ValentiDirector, Communicationsrvalenti@brt.org
 


Membership ContactLeAnne Redick WilsonSenior Vice President​lwilson@brt.org



All Staff

 



    


What is Business Roundtable

Business Roundtable (BRT) is an association of chief executive officers of leading U.S. companies working to promote sound public policy and a thriving U.S. economy.



Learn More About BRT

 







Contact
Growth Agenda
 


About
Issues & Committees
Resources
Media
Blog
 






            Search          








Sort by 
RelevanceDate created (indexed)




Order 
AscDesc



 


 
 


More Than Leaders. Leadership.



Business Roundtable is an association of chief executive officers of leading U.S. companies working to promote a thriving economy and expanded opportunity for all Americans through sound public policy. 
About BRT







AboutBoard of Directors
Committees
History of BRT
Members
Staff
Contact Us

 
 




banner-about-section.jpg

 






Juan Ramón Alaix





 Chief Executive Officer 
 Zoetis  

 
 
Tweet 












Juan Ramón Alaix was appointed chief executive officer of Zoetis (formerly Pfizer Animal Health) in July 2012. In this role, he leads the world’s largest company with a singular focus on animal health medicines and vaccines. He is a member of the Zoetis Board of Directors.
Juan Ramón served as president of Pfizer Animal Health since 2006, where he was responsible for the overall strategic direction and financial performance of the company. Under his leadership, the company grew to become a $4.2 billion enterprise in 2011 with more than 9,500 employees in more than 70 countries.
He joined Pfizer from Pharmacia in 2003 as regional president. He has 35 years’ experience of increasing responsibility in finance, sales and management, including 20 years in the pharmaceutical industry. In the 1990s, Juan Ramón served in general management with Rhône-Poulenc Rorer in Spain and Belgium before becoming country president of Spain for Pharmacia in 1998.
In 2011, Juan Ramón was elected to a two-year term as president of the International Federation for Animal Health (IFAH) in addition to serving as a member of the board and executive committee. IFAH represents manufacturers of veterinary medicines, vaccines and other animal health products in both developed and emerging markets.
A native of Spain, Juan Ramón received a graduate degree in economics from the Universidad de Madrid.
 


 







  


 


Download PDF 
 









Sitemap
Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions
RSS
 


Twitter
Facebook
YouTube
Medium
 
 

 


















Juan Ramón Alaix • Montana Ag Summit 2017 - Great Falls, MT















































































Contact info@agsummitmontana.com for more information.
FacebookTwitter












  













Previous Next 

Juan Ramón Alaix

Juan Ramón Alaix is Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of Zoetis. In this role, he leads the world’s leading animal health company with a singular focus on animal health medicines and vaccines, complemented by diagnostic products, genetic tests, biodevices and technical services. Under Juan Ramón’s leadership, the company generated annual revenue of $4.9 billion in 2016 with approximately 9,000 employees worldwide. Prior to becoming CEO in 2012, Juan Ramón served as President of Pfizer Animal Health since 2006, where he was responsible for the overall strategic direct​ion and financial performance of the company. He joined Pfizer in 2003 as regional president following its acquisition of Pharmacia, where he served as country president for Spain.  Previously, Juan Ramón held general management roles with Rhône-Poulenc Rorer in Spain and Belgium.  He brings the perspective of 35 years’ experience of increasing responsibility in finance, sales and management, including 20 years in the pharmaceutical industry.




wendtagency 


			2017-04-17T05:04:41+00:00		
April 17th, 2017| 
Share This Story, Choose Your Platform!
FacebookTwitterLinkedinPinterestEmail 



 Recent Updates 

Sonny Perdue
May 4, 2017


Ag Secretary Perdue to Keynote Montana Ag Summit 2017
May 3, 2017


U.S. Senator Pat Roberts
April 17, 2017


Phil DiPofi
April 17, 2017


Keith McGovern
April 17, 2017


 Stay Updated






 
 
 

 
 
 
 


MENU

HomeAbout Us▼SpeakersAgendaMedia InfoAccommodationsRecent NewsRegister





Register for the 2017 Montana Ag Summit today.


 











Zoetis (ZTS) Juan Ramón Alaix on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Zoetis (ZTS) Juan Ramón Alaix on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptFeb.16.16 | About: Zoetis (ZTS) Zoetis, Inc. (NYSE:ZTS)
Q4 2015 Earnings Call
February 16, 2016 8:30 am ET
Executives
John O'Connor - Vice President, Investor Relations
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Analysts
Kevin K. Ellich - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Louise Chen - Guggenheim Securities LLC
Alex Arfaei - BMO Capital Markets (United States)
Erin Wilson - Credit Suisse Securities (NYSE:USA) LLC (Broker)
John C. Kreger - William Blair & Co. LLC
Christopher Schott - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Jami Rubin - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Douglas Tsao - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Mark J. Schoenebaum - Evercore ISI
David R. Risinger - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Kathy M. Miner - Cowen & Co. LLC
Jeffrey Holford - Jefferies LLC
Operator
Good day and welcome to the fourth quarter and full year 2015 financial results conference call and webcast for Zoetis. Hosting the call today is John O'Connor, Vice President of Investor Relations for Zoetis.
The presentation materials and additional financial tables are currently posted on the Investor Relations section of zoetis.com. The presentation slides can be managed by you, the viewer, and will not be forwarded automatically. In addition, a replay of this call will be available approximately two hours after the conclusion of this call via dial-in or on the Investor Relations section of zoetis.com.
At this time all participants have been placed in a listen-only mode and the floor will be opened for your questions following the presentation.
In the interest of time, we ask that you limit yourself to one question and then queue up again with any follow-ups.
It's now my pleasure to turn the floor over to John O'Connor. You may begin, sir.
John O'Connor - Vice President, Investor Relations
Thank you, operator. Good morning and welcome to the Zoetis fourth quarter and full year 2015 earnings call. I'm joined today by Juan Ramón Alaix, our Chief Executive Officer; and Paul Herendeen, our Chief Financial Officer.
Before we begin I'll remind you that the slides presented on this call are available on the Investor Relations section of our website, and that our remarks today will include forward-looking statements and actual results could differ materially from those projections. For a full list and description of certain factors that could cause results to differ, I refer you to the forward-looking statement in today's press release and our SEC filings including but not limited to our 2014 annual report on Form 10-K and our reports on Form 10-Q.
Our remarks today will also include references to certain financial measures which were not prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles or U.S. GAAP. A reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable U.S. GAAP measures is included in the financial tables that accompany our earnings press release and in the company's 8-K filing dated today, February 16, 2016. We also cite operational results, which exclude the impact of foreign exchange.
With that I will turn the call over to Juan Ramón.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you, John. And good morning, everyone. In today's call I will provide perspective color based on the performance for the full year 2015 and our goals for 2016. Paul will discuss some of the fourth quarter highlights, the 2015 net results and our guidance for 2016 and 2017.
In 2015, we affirm Zoetis' reputation as the global leader in the animal health industry with a strong financial performance, continued investment in our future growth and a commitment to creating a value for our customers and shareholders.
For 2015 our diverse portfolio enabled us to grow our revenues by 8% operationally, with particular strength coming from R&D innovations and acquired products from Abbott Animal Health.

In our three years as a public company, we have been delivering consistent operational revenue growth and we expect our 2015 to show again that we are growing faster than the industry. We grew our adjusted net income by 24% operationally, and grew our adjusted EBIT margin from 25% to 28% as we continue our focus on greater efficiency in our business.
Even while we are scrutinizing our efficiency, we also continue to allocate resources for future growth. We invested $1.6 billion in 2015 across strategic acquisitions, internal research and development and capital expenditures in areas like manufacturing and supply. And finally, in 2015 we returned approximately $370 million in excess capital to our shareholders in the form of dividends and share repurchases.
This performance reflects our disciplined implementation of our business plan and our colleagues' tremendous dedication to serving our customers. I am pleased to say that as a result we met our guidance for revenue and exceeded our guidance for adjusted net income in 2015.
On a reported basis we had a flat revenue growth due to an 800 basis point impact from foreign currency, but we still grew our reported adjusted net income by 13% thanks to our continued focus on achieving our efficiency goals.
Looking ahead to 2016, first and foremost we are focused on delivering our financial guidance for the year. We are projecting 2% to 4% operational revenue growth, which reflects the impact of our SKU realization and changes to our operations in Venezuela. Excluding those impacts, we expect to grow revenues 8% to 10% operationally with 2 percentage points coming from the addition of PHARMAQ. This means organic growth is expected to be faster than the market again.
And for 2017 we expect to continue growing faster than market at the rate of 5% to 9% as we are confident in our end markets, business model, the prospects for new product launches, improved product supply and progress in our efficiency goals. We are also confident in our pricing strategy. Our prices are defined by the value that we can demonstrate to our customers who buy and pay for the products we completely independent of third-party payers.
In January we updated our adjusted EPS guidance for 2016 and 2017 to reflect the impact of the European Commission decision on our tax rate. Today we are pleased to reaffirm our 2016 and 2017 guidance for adjusted earnings per share despite the negative impact of foreign currency and the change in our operations in Venezuela, which will have a negative impact of $0.06 in 2016 and $0.08 in 2017.
Our second objective for 2016 is to ensure the successful launch of new products that are critical for our long-term revenue growth. We are increasing supply for APOQUEL and also launching in new markets. This growth already surpassed $100 million with a limited availability in 2015, and we see significant room to grow from this level with long-term peak sales of more than $300 million.
Another important breakthrough in the area of dermatology, our canine antibody therapy against atopic dermatitis has been introduced in the U.S. to veterinarians and dermatologists, and we are preparing for global market availability later in 2016.
Meanwhile SIMPARICA, a new oral parasiticide, will help us to better compete in the global market of flea and tick products, a market of approximately $3 billion. SIMPARICA was approved in the EU later last year, and we are awaiting approval in the U.S. this quarter. We expect the launch in both the U.S. and EU in the first quarter of 2016, and see sales ramp up during the year.
Our third major objective this year is enhancing the supply and customer service, an area where we fell short last year. As we continue with our supply network strategy, we are making steady improvements, most notably in APOQUEL. We're also investing to build capacity in product categories that will be an important part of our future revenue base.

In the near term we believe that a simplified supply chain with fewer manufacturing plants, focused on expanding the set of products will improve our performance. We also remain on track to complete the global implementation of our new Enterprise Resource Planning system, or ERP, in the first quarter. The ERP will support our overall efficiency goals and will help us better manage the processes and information to run our business. And we continue to refine these systems over the course of the year; we'll make certain we are exceeding our customers' expectations.
Our fourth major objective is around capital allocation and how we maximize our cost structure, investment in R&D and business development. We are making a good progress in shaping our cost structure as part of the overall efficiency plan we announced last May. That work has been accelerated, and the additional cost savings has been included in our guidance.
It is equally important to realize that while we are implementing these plans, we have remained committed to building the three interconnected capabilities that drive our success with customers: U.S. sales, innovative R&D, and high quality and reliable manufacturing and supply. The implementation has been resourced, even as we go through changes in other areas of the company.
Our investment in R&D continues showing high return and support for our future growth. I am very pleased to say that our efforts to refresh our portfolio with innovative vaccines offerings, especially in companion animal are paying off. Last year, we launched a new combination vaccine for dogs across the EU called Versican Plus, and has been very well received by customers.
In the fourth quarter, Zoetis was granted a conditional license from the USDA to market our canine influenza vaccine, the first conditional licensed vaccine to help control disease associated with canine influenza, the virus that is H3N2.
In December, we received our U.S. license for VANGUARD crLyme, a vaccine that aids in the prevention of conditions associated with Lyme disease in dogs. And in November, we expanded our INNOVATOR horse vaccine franchise in the U.S. with the launch of our vaccine to aid in the prevention of leptospirosis.
Meanwhile in aquatic health, shortly after closing our deal with PHARMAQ in the fourth quarter, one of their new vaccines for salmon received an emergency license in Chile, one of the world's largest farmed fish markets.
Our focus on enhancing our portfolio resulted in recent approvals for new indications and formulation of existing products. In January, Zoetis received FDA approval for an update to the labeling for CERENIA, which allow for intravenous administration during the surgical protocols that use medication that induces vomiting.
We launched a new formulation of LUTALYSE, a reproductive product for use in dairy and beef cattle, in the U.S. We are also viewed as a partner of choice, for all innovators in the industry.
In January we enter into an agreement with Anatara Lifesciences, a company in Australia. We'll be evaluating their non-antibiotic, anti-infective product as an alternative to antibiotics that could treat and control infections in farm animals.
And finally, in terms of business development, we'll continue to look for M&A opportunities like we did last year with Abbott Animal Health and PHARMAQ, while we continue with our internal investment in new products, lifecycle innovation and research alliances.
In summary, we delivered an excellent 2015, built in our diverse and market-leading portfolio of products for animal health. We are getting significant traction in the business as we continue reducing complexity, achieving efficiencies, and freeing up resources for our most promising growth opportunities. And we remain well positioned as the industry leader based on our core capabilities and singular focus on animal health.

With that, let me turn things over to Paul. Paul?
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Thanks. Thank you, Juan Ramón. Let me put an exclamation point on Juan Ramón's overview of 2015. What a terrific year we had. If you think back to a year ago, we had a number of very challenging initiatives in front of us, most notably, the design and implementation of the efficiency initiative that we announced in May, and also the rollout of our enterprise-wide SAP system in our most important market, the U.S., as well as many other key locations around the world. I can tell you that both of those projects put enormous pressure on the company, on our colleagues, and in some cases impacted our customers. But we were able to stay on task, overcome many challenges, and deliver results that we're very proud of.
So let's talk about our performance. We had very strong sales growth in the U.S., up 13% for the full year, driven by good livestock sales primarily in cattle, the addition of Abbott Animal Health, and increased supplies of APOQUEL. In the international business we delivered operational sales growth of 4%, which reflected good performance in major markets like Brazil and China, which grew 11% and 17% respectively, partially offset by the business changes that we are making in Venezuela.
We reduced our total operating expenses by 1% on an operational basis in 2015 compared with 2014 while growing revenue 8% operationally. We kicked off our efficiency initiative in May and were able to capture meaningful savings in 2015, particularly in the second half of the year when we reduced our operating expenses by 3% on an operational basis while we were growing revenue 7% operationally.
To be fair, the true test of the operating efficiency improvements that we are making will come over the long term. Anyone can cut costs and improve profits in the short term. The challenge is to improve profits and then grow that larger profit pool at an attractive rate. To do that, you need to be thoughtful about where, how, and how much you reduce costs. We continue to prioritize and spend behind activities that deliver value to our customers and therefore support our growth, namely our sales forces, our R&D engine, and our supply chain, so very good stuff for the full year 2015.
Let me turn to the quarter quickly. You can read the details of our fourth quarter results in the press release and tables, but let me hit on a few highlights, focusing on themes that may be impactful on our future results, starting with revenue. Again, good operational revenue growth of 6% in the quarter coming against a very strong quarter in 2014. Next, improvement in operating efficiency; total operating expenses were down 8% operationally in the quarter, and this enabled us to grow adjusted net income by 29% operationally.
Foreign currency continued to be a strong headwind for us as it is for most multi-nationals. Changes in FX rates reduced Q4 reported revenue growth compared with the prior-year quarter by some 900 basis points. There's a word for that; it's brutal.
Setting aside FX, we feel very good about the underlying drivers of our operational; that is, constant currency revenue growth. For the quarter, the 6% operational revenue growth included 3% from increased APOQUEL sales due to better supply, 3% from the acquisition of the Abbott Animal Health products, 2% from price increases across the portfolio, and 1% from new products. Yet these drivers were partially offset by a 3% decline of in-line product revenues. I want to point out that's primarily related to ongoing changes to our business model in Venezuela and other countries like India, which were initiated as part of our efficiency program.
As I said previously, the changes we have made and are making to our business model in certain markets impacted our second half 2015 performance and will have impact on our 2016 revenue growth. But these changes improve our prospects for longer-term revenue and profit growth. That's the prize.

In the case of Venezuela, you'll recall that we are reducing our activities there due to unfavorable economic conditions for multi-national companies. We've been selling down our inventories in the country, limiting our future exports to Venezuela, and this quarter we decided to revalue our assets and liabilities there, based on the free floating SIMADI exchange rate.
In the case of India, we remain committed to our business there, especially in our companion animal and poultry businesses, with a direct field force. However, we are making changes in our approach to the dairy segment. That segment has not consolidated in the way that we had expected over the last several years, and so we are eliminating our dairy field force there and pursuing a distributor partnership to serve those market needs.
It's worth noting that revenue from our other emerging market geography includes Venezuela and India, and declined 3% operationally in the fourth quarter. If you want to go back and you can exclude India and Venezuela, other emerging markets would have grown by 12%. The other emerging markets segment will continue to be an area where we see some noise in 2016, as it includes the countries that will be most significantly impacted by the SKU reductions, as well as market changes that we are undertaking as part of our efficiency programs.
While I'm on the subject of international markets, I know there continues to be general concerns with the outlook for countries like China and Brazil, given lots of recent media reports about their slower GDP growth and their economic outlooks. Generally, demand for animal health products is tied to more stable growth drivers, mainly the demand for animal proteins and the increased adoption and medicalization of pets, both of which move as a function of population, income, and urbanization.
Fundamentals in the animal health segments of both China and Brazil remain strong, and here's the proof. For the full year 2015, we grew revenue in China and Brazil on an operational basis 17% and 11% respectively. In the fourth quarter, China and Brazil grew 14% and 10% respectively. Both markets on a constant currency basis are growing at healthy rates and the growth prospects of these markets remain solid. And so I pose the question rhetorically. Why is that?
For China it's two things. One is the fact that the consumption of animal proteins in China is growing and has continued to grow even in challenging economic times. Second is the goal of the Chinese government to see an improvement in the productivity, safety, and quality of their food supply. That means moving from smaller farms producing animal proteins to a more industrialized model, and that model requires more animal health products to maintain and drive the productivity of the business. Now frankly, as I'm saying this, the second factor should be the first. It's a powerful driver, and it will last for many years.
Now turning to Brazil, Brazil is a very developed livestock market, and domestic consumption of animal protein is only a part of the equation. Brazil is a significant exporter of meat. And so to the extent that the consumption falls within their borders, they have the opportunity to use exports to maintain the health of their livestock businesses. With the weakness of the real, exports are even more attractive today. So counter to what you might conclude when seeing negative headlines about conditions in Brazil, the Brazilian livestock industry and the supporting animal health industry are quite strong.
Using China and Brazil as examples, the key takeaway should be that we operate in an industry that's very resilient. Now I use that word quite a bit, even in times of economic stress, and that applies to developed as well as emerging markets.

Turning to restructuring charges, this quarter we had significant one-time costs that drove a decrease in our reported GAAP net income and earnings per share. Let me explain this quarter's major charges in terms of the three buckets that we use.
First, the standup costs which are mainly associated with our separation from Pfizer totaled $34 million in the quarter. That work will be substantially completed by mid-2016. We recorded $4 million of costs associated with our supply network strategy, and we are still in the early days of that initiative. And we also recorded $52 million of one-time costs associated with our operational efficiency initiative which reflected the acceleration of some of those plans and the associated costs into the fourth quarter of 2015.
And finally, we have taken accounting actions related to the revaluation of our bolivar-denominated assets and liabilities in Venezuela this quarter. We believe it's appropriate to change to the SIMADI rate as our exchange rate for Venezuela. And accordingly, we recorded charges of approximately $93 million in the fourth quarter.
In the fourth quarter, we also announced the sale or exit of five manufacturing sites in the U.S., India and Taiwan, which we expect to generate proceeds in excess of $80 million of cash during 2016.
Turning to guidance, we've provided a bridge in our tables and slides to help show the changes in our guidance for 2016 and 2017, to spotlight the impact of changes in FX rates and changes to our operations in Venezuela. We now expect for the full year 2016 revenue of between $4.65 billion to $4.775 billion, reported diluted EPS of between $1.30 and $1.48 per share, and adjusted diluted EPS between $1.71 and $1.81 per share.
For full year 2017, we expect revenue between $4.95 billion and $5.15 billion, reported diluted EPS of between $1.95 and $2.13 per share, and adjusted diluted EPS between $2.18 and $2.32 per share. Our revised guidance reflects the impact of the European Commission's decision on Belgium's tax rulings and the related effect on our earnings, which we disclosed in early January.
Our effective tax rate on adjusted pre-tax income is expected to be approximately 33% in 2016 and 30% in 2017. In January we communicated that the changes to our tax rates reduced our expectations for adjusted diluted EPS guidance for 2016 and 2017 by $0.13 and $0.06 per share respectively. Note that we expect to record one-time net tax charges during 2016 of approximately $55 million, of which approximately $35 million to $45 million will be recorded in Q1.
These Q1 charges relate to the nullification of our Belgium tax ruling by the European Commission for the periods from 2013 through 2015. Included in the total $55 million charge is an estimate of a future impact of the revaluation of deferred tax accounts currently associated with our Belgium operation. You can see these $55 million of one-time costs footnoted in our guidance bridge for 2016.
Our revised guidance today also reflects our latest views of our operations in Venezuela, updated FX rates as of the end of January, and other efficiency improvements to offset some of those impacts. Here's some really good news. Other than the impact of the change to our expected tax rate due to the EC ruling, a factor over which we had no control, we're holding our guidance range for adjusted earnings per share for both 2016 and 2017.
We expect the momentum that we carried through Q4 combined with the expected pace and magnitude of the efficiency initiative should enable us to offset the unrelenting headwinds of FX rates and the change to our business model in Venezuela. Yeah, we're proud of that.
And since I have the floor and I like to talk about our company, here's my summary of the year. Looking back at 2015, what you see is another year where the global animal health industry posted solid mid-single-digit growth despite many challenges in many economies around the world. And you saw our company, Zoetis, deliver strong operational growth of revenue, up 8%, by pulling on all of the levers that we have available to us: the best animal health sales forces on the planet, the most productive R&D team in the industry, value-generative M&A, and a supply chain that is a core strength of the company.

And we delivered operational growth of adjusted earnings per share of 24% for the year. And I'm going to repeat that because it's awesome. Adjusted earnings per share for the full year 2015 increased 24% on a constant currency basis to $1.77 per share. I call out the $1.77 because while we always measure ourselves on a constant currency basis, at the end of the day we put an actual dollar amount on the tape.
Way back in November of 2014 we put 2015 guidance on the – excuse me – 2015 guidance on the table. We guided revenue in the range of $4.85 billion to $4.95 billion and adjusted earnings per share of $1.61 to $1.68. Since that time, we, like many multinational companies, have been battered by FX that dramatically reduced our reported revenues. But here's where we're different from many of those other multinationals. Throughout 2015 we held the line on our guidance for adjusted earnings per share and in November of 2015 we actually raised the range to $1.70 to $1.74. And now we report actual results of $1.77 per share.
We're able to do that because we as a management team brought forward a plan in May of last year to improve the efficiency of our cost structure and then we as a team got after it and reduced and controlled expenses to give us the best shot in delivering to you, our shareholders, the best earnings we could under the circumstances. As I love to say, pretty good.
So here's my pitch. The global animal health industry is not just resilient; it has characteristics that point to an extended period of predictable mid-single-digit growth. And the number one company in the global animal health industry is Zoetis. In the three years since we've been public, we've put results on the board that support what we see as our key value drivers.
First, we can grow our revenues at a rate equal to or faster than the mid-single-digit growth rate expected for our industry. Second, we can leverage our expense structure to drive increasing operating margins, delivering profit growth faster than revenue growth. And third, we can intelligently allocate our capital; actively manage our capital structure to grow adjusted earnings per share faster than operating profits.
In today's dystopian financial markets where investors may be looking for shelter from the storm, I think my suggestion would be to look at companies in reverse alphabetical order and start with Z for Zoetis.
That's it for my prepared remarks. Let's get to Q&A. Keith?
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Okay. We can take our first question from Kevin Ellich with Piper Jaffray. Please go ahead.
Kevin K. Ellich - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Good morning, thanks for taking the questions. I guess, Paul, could you just go back to the contributions from acquisitions in the quarter? I kind of missed those prepared remarks. And then, Juan Ramón, I wanted to get an update on SIMPARICA as well. I think in the press release it says you expect approval now in Q1. I think previously you said first half of 2016 so I guess what's the change and what should we expect heading into Western Vet?
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Yeah, I'll start, Kevin. Good morning. It's Paul. I'll start with the components of the growth. We had 6% operational revenue growth in the quarter and we recognize the goal was whole percentages here so there's rounding that comes into play but it was 3% from increased APOQUEL sales, 3% from the acquisition of the Abbott Animal Health products, 2% from price increase across the portfolio, and 1% from new products. Then the offset to that was about a 3% decline of what I guess we'll call revenues of all other products. And again, that is primarily related to the change in the business model in Venezuela and countries like India and places that were affected by our efficiency initiative. I hope that answers the question.

Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you, Paul. I will take the question on the SIMPARICA. So we submitted to the FDA all the information and based on the normal timing for approval, we expect SIMPARICA to be approved in the U.S. in the first quarter. This all will be depending on final decision of the FDA. Next question, please?
Operator
And our next question comes from Louise Chen with Guggenheim. Please go ahead.
Louise Chen - Guggenheim Securities LLC
Hi. Thanks for taking my question. So I do see slide 18 in your presentation but I was wondering if you could help us better understand the underlying sales growth for the year without the impact from restructuring and SKU reductions? And then also, do you expect your sales growth to accelerate after these programs are completed? And when might we actually see that? Thanks.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Sure. Louise, its Paul. Let me take that, and thank you for asking the question, Louise, because if you just take the headline and say, gee, we're looking at 2% to 4% operational growth in revenue next year, people say, what's up with that? So let's start with from the 2% to 4%, the operational efficiency initiative, the effect on SKUs, and now Venezuela and other markets where we're going to change our model, reduced that by some 600 basis points. You can see that if you look at that slide 18, 600 basis points. So there's 8% to 10% if you're thinking about what our actual expectations are for normalized operational revenue growth in 2016 v. 2015. And if you want to take PHARMAQ out of the equation and go what's the organic portion of that, it's about 200 basis points.
So as you look at that slide, again I'll call everyone's attention to it, we tried our level best to help you think about the strength of 2016 because this is quite a strong year by showing you this waterfall slide. So 2% to 4%, 600 basis points on the efficiency initiative, SKU reductions, Venezuela, India, et cetera, gets you to 8% to 10%, and if you want to look at that on an organic basis it would be 6% to 8% by taking PHARMAQ out of the mix.
Before I concede the floor, I want to say two things before I talk about 2016, because we did change from 3% to 5% operational growth to 2% to 4%. That is predominantly because we had previously articulated that range at the midpoint of our 2015 guidance for revenue. And as you saw, we had strong revenue in Q4, and for 2015 it was about $25 million higher than that. And that accounts for the change from 3% to 5% down to 2% to 4%. We feel really good about what we put on the table in 2015. And as we think about it, we really are excited about 2016, even though it will be masked a little bit by the changes that we are making to our model.
Now last before I concede the floor, you asked the question about what could we expect in 2017. We expect a return to the same kind of solid growth that you would have expected in 2016 but for the change in the efficiency initiative. We're currently forecasting on an operational basis 5% to 9%. That's pretty solid, and that's being driven mainly by new products. Next question, please.
Operator
And the next question comes from Alex Arfaei with BMO Capital Markets.
Alex Arfaei - BMO Capital Markets (United States)
Good morning, folks. Thank you for all the details on the slides and congratulations on a strong operational performance in 2015. Paul, cost of sales grew at a higher rate than revenues in the quarter, and as a result gross margin was lower year over year and sequentially versus 3Q. I was wondering if you could give us your thoughts there on gross margin.
And just a general question for the both of you, your stock has obviously been underperforming despite this strong operational performance. I'm wondering if you could give us your thoughts on that. And is there an opportunity for a more aggressive share buyback at these levels? Thank you.

Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Sure, it's Paul. I'll take the Q4 margin. That was predominantly due to FX. Again, I would look at the full year and how we came out, and it was in line with what we were expecting. I know, Alex, we've traveled together a little bit. You look at a quarter; there can be a lot of variability that sneaks into the equation. You compare it against this, that and the other thing. Things happen in a 90-day period that smooth themselves out over the year. I would look at the 65%-odd margin that we put on the board for the full year, and that's indicative of the strength. But the one thing in the fourth quarter was FX. FX is hard to forecast when it flows through cost of sales, but it sure does.
The second thing I think you asked a question about the share price. We're watching our company along with many others lose value, at least in the eyes of shareholders or people who are holding our stock. We continue to do what we can do. We're driving real fundamental value. You posed the question about our share buyback and the scale of that, et cetera. I'd point out that when we were last in the window I guess, which was in the early part of November, the stock was $43 – $44, I think, and I'm going from memory here, $43 – $44. And we elected at that point in time to increase the pace of our purchases. As everybody can do the math, we bought about $50 million a quarter through 2015. We're currently buying stock back at a pace of about $75 million a quarter. I know that's not a ton. But as I said also many times, we had a lot of calls on cash in 2016, but even so we elected to increase the pace at which we were wanting to acquire shares. So I hope that answers the questions.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
I will add a comment here, Alex. I think that in many cases our company is still associated with the human pharmaceutical industry. And discussions on prices, for instance, have been affecting the human pharmaceutical industry, while this should not be having any impact in our share value. Our prices, as I mentioned in my comments, are completely dependent on third-party payers. We price based on the value that we can demonstrate to our customers, and our customers are not only buying and paying the products they buy from us. So this is something that in my opinion should be also included when different investors or analysts also define the value of Zoetis and also the value of the animal health industry in general.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Next question, please.
Operator
And the next question is from Erin Wilson with Credit Suisse.
Erin Wilson - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)
Great, thanks for taking my questions. How should we think about the quarterly progression of the U.S. livestock business? And could you characterize the overall health of the U.S. livestock industry just more broadly?
And then one on R&D; on the parasiticide front, should we expect that you're ready to launch as soon as SIMPARICA gets approval in the U.S.? And then with the potential flea, tick, and heartworm combination chewable product, longer term, how long in the pipeline, or how far along in the pipeline is this product? And when should we expect it I guess to launch, and is it in the guidance?
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
So thank you, Erin, for your question. In terms of the launch of SIMPARICA, we are ready to launch as soon as we get approval from the FDA. We're also ready to launch not only in U.S. but also in the European markets. And the team is ready, the plans are in place, and we have a product to supply to the market.
You also asked a question about the livestock progression in the U.S. And definitely we have seen that in general the livestock has been performing well in 2015. In terms of the quarters, the fourth quarter has been stronger than expected because already in the last year, we reported very strong revenue growth, and in this year also we grew significantly. And in terms of the different areas of livestock, we see also opportunities in cattle, we see opportunities in poultry, and we see opportunities also in swine. We expect also in 2016, the momentum will continue. We see positive trends in the cattle industry, mainly on beef; that we expect that the number of animals will increase by 3% or 3.5%. And this will expect, also will drive additional use of animal health products. And you also asked about...

Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
The combination product.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
The flea and tick and the heartworm. Definitely, our R&D team is working on developing this product and finalizing all the information for submitting all the dossiers to the FDA. We have not yet communicated when we plan to have this product into the market. As we get closer to the finalization of all the different filings, then we'll communicate to the market. And this has not been included in our guidance for 2017. So next question, please.
Operator
We'll go next to John Kreger with William Blair.
John C. Kreger - William Blair & Co. LLC
Hi, thanks very much. You mentioned that you had some issues last year with customer service. I think you said mainly around APOQUEL. Can you just expand upon that? Is that issue behind you? How comfortable are you that you will not have any residual issues as we move through 2016?
And then, Paul, maybe just talk a little bit more about longer term, your tax rate thoughts? Do you think 30% is the long term right number to use, or is there an opportunity to maybe push that lower? Thanks.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
So we have had supply issues for APOQUEL, and the supply issue has been resolved now. We have now the process for the production of the active pharmaceutical ingredient that had been the bottleneck of manufacturing APOQUEL. We have a process which is much more robust and much more consistent. And we are really producing all the product that will be delivered in 2016, and we'll increase significantly the supply to the market. We are also planning to expand APOQUEL to the rest of the world in where the product has been approved, and we plan to do that in 2016. So we are convinced that APOQUEL will deliver significant growth and all the issues that we faced in 2015 will be behind us.
We also reported in 2015 that the implementation of the new ERP also created some issues in terms of deliveries of products into the market. We are very pleased now how the implementation of the ERP has been now performed in the U.S. We have now 90% of our orders delivered the same day, which is a significant achievement, and we are working on improving there, the rest of the functions that also are provided to the customers. We expect that also the ERP, will be supporting our operations in a very efficient way in 2016. And this is something we plan to finalize all implementation of the new system in this quarter, and then moving forward, to maximize the way that we'll be supporting our business.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
John, its Paul. I'll take the tax question. First let me just say we were very disappointed with the European Commission's kind of stating that the Belgium tax rulings like we had are illegal, and essentially nullified our arrangement there. We're disappointed because the Belgians have been very supportive; we've built a terrific operation there. I think I've said in a prior public forum, the Belgians on the contrary, have been one of the more responsible countries with respect to tax policy and how they used it to attract employment and investment into their country and it's a shame.
So set that aside, we're very disappointed. It obviously was not something that we were planning on. And let's pretend that, that didn't happen for a second. We had previously articulated, we thought our tax rate in, call it 2017, would have been on the order of 28%, our adjusted ETR roughly 28%, and now it's 30%. So we lost a couple of hundred basis points there in 2017. But what I would suggest to you is, just as we had articulated with respect to our structure before this happened, we can grind that down, but we wouldn't be grinding it down.

The frustrating thing for us is, we were doing pretty well, fine tuning our global operating model to be efficient and here we have to go back and we have to change course a little bit. So not something – it was not a happy day for us but we're responding the best way that we can. And I think the way we look at it is we just add 200 basis points higher ETR in 2017 and our job is to grind that down. Next question, please.
Operator
And the next question comes from Chris Schott with JPMorgan.
Christopher Schott - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Great. Thanks very much. Just a couple of here. First, on the 6% impact from the SKU reduction in 2016, I guess now that we're further along in that process, any surprises in terms of customer behavior, in terms of the SKU changes? And I guess is there an opportunity for that number to be lower than 6%, either through uptake of alternatives of those products, or just other initiatives you put in place?
And the second question which is as we're looking out 2016, just any dynamics we should be keeping in mind for modeling this year in terms of quarterly progression? I guess are there any particularly difficult or easy comps that we should be watching as we're kind of thinking about the quarters this year? Thanks very much.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you, Chris. What we evaluated very carefully when we decided to reduce SKUs on how will be the impact to our customers, we made sure that none of the SKUs that we are eliminating has no alternative to our customers. These alternatives can be from our competitors or can be alternatives, in our portfolio. The 6% impact in our revenues is the net result of reduction and also the assumption that some of these reductions of SKUs will be moved to other SKUs in our portfolio.
In terms of reaction from our customers, I think in some cases, well, they will like to have these products in their portfolio, but they also understand that more important than offering 13,000 SKUs is ensuring that we have a reliable supply. What we want to make sure that when they place an order, they get the order on time to treat or protect the animals. And this is one of the important strategic rationales for our SKU rationalization. It was not only to improve gross margin, but also to ensure that our supply to the market is much more consistent and we can meet all customer submissions. And then Paul will take the question on the phasing in terms of quarters.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
I think there are two things that I'd be mindful of; one is how the SKU reduction plays out with respect to our revenues. You'll recall that we announced this program in the middle part of 2015, and so we're just starting to see here in Q4 an alignment to Q1 and Q2, the impacts of the SKU rationalization. And it will be relative to the prior year, it will be a significant factor. But we will have to keep our eye on.
The second part is with respect to our cost, our efficiency initiative. We continue to ramp up the amount of savings that we are seeing flow through, and of course the first half of last year we had a modest amount of cost containment or that occurred in the first half, but that steps up and we currently are tracking, as you saw, with an 8% operational reduction in operating expenses in Q4, tracking at a much lower rate, so that will be a very helpful driver on the operating expense side in the first half of the year, and then that benefit, if you will, comparing back to the prior year will moderate over the second half of the year.
I think that's about all we want to cover on phasing. Just lastly, I'll say it again and again and again, we look at our business on a yearly basis. Trying to – I know you have to and that's what you do and all, and we'll try to be as helpful as we can with respect to the phasing but we run our business on an annual basis. Next question, please.

Operator
Our next question is from Jami Rubin with Goldman Sachs.
Jami Rubin - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Thank you. Just a couple. First, Paul, maybe you can answer this. On the 2% contribution from price, can you talk about the outlook? How did that look on a global basis U.S. versus outside of the U.S.? And what is the outlook for price increases going forward both in the U.S. and across different geographies.
And then, Juan Ramón, just a question for you; as you are now, congratulations, three years as an independent company and it's been very exciting to see how Zoetis has evolved and achieved such tremendous success in a short period of time. Congratulations. But maybe you could just sort of step back and tell us – when I look at the industry, the animal health industry, it doesn't seem that a whole lot has changed. It still remains highly fragmented. We've seen a little bit of movement with Novartis swapping its business to Lilly. You've made a couple small acquisitions. But by and large, the industry hasn't changed much. Do you see more consolidation going forward? Or do you see some of your peers spinning out their animal health businesses like you have done for yourself? And what does this all mean for your future in terms of M&A? Thanks very much.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you, Jami. And I will try to answer both questions. So in terms of the 2%, so the 2%, as you mentioned, it's a global increase. And in terms of where we see this 2% in the different geographies, definitely we have been very consistent in the U.S. with price increases of around 2%. And in the rest of the markets, it depends. So in high inflationary markets, we increased significantly the prices to compensate for inflation and also to compensate for foreign exchange.
In some markets where the economies are – the inflation is very stable or probably not having any inflation at all, so we are also trying to adjust our prices based on these situations. So in Europe or Japan and some other markets we have been increasing prices but at a lower rate than in the U.S. or some of the markets where we had the opportunity to increase the prices because of inflation.
The second question was related to the consolidation of the industry and the top four or five now animal healthcare companies represent almost 70% of the total market, which has already been increased significantly from some years ago.
Do I see opportunities for further consolidation? I think there are still opportunities, especially on the second tier of companies, after these four or five companies we see opportunities for the consolidation. We expect now the merger of Boehringer Ingelheim and Merial being completed, there's another round of consolidation, and maybe in the future also we'll see some additional consolidation. Definitely the consolidation would be limited because of antitrust issues, but without these antitrust issues or managing these antitrust issues, definitely consolidation can represent a good opportunity for the animal health industry.
The last comment I want to add is that the top 10 companies in animal health represent something like 80% of the total market. On the 20% which is remaining we have maybe hundreds of companies that in -where I expect that this will be a significant consolidation here. And Paul will add some comments in terms of the pricing.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Sure. I mean Jami asked a specific question. I think Jami was trying to get to where is our pricing power. For the full year, emphasis full year, our price added approximately – a little better than 2% overall but U.S. is about 2% and international was about 3%. Again, a lot of rounding here, but more price increases outside the U.S. than in. Next question, please.

Jami Rubin - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Thank you, Paul.
Operator
The next question comes from Doug Tsao with Barclays.
Douglas Tsao - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Hi, good morning. Thanks for taking the questions. Maybe if you could provide a little bit more of an update in terms of how you will sort of increase the availability of APOQUEL, is this what we start now in terms of broadening the number of veterinarians who will have access to the product? Or is it going to be focused more on current – expanding to new patients? Also, if you can just provide some commentary in terms of the MFA business and how it's faring right now? One of your competitors spoke about some regulatory headwinds in that business and whether you're seeing those as well? Thank you.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you, Doug. In terms of the increase for APOQUEL, so let me start saying that we have now two sources of the production of API and the second source that will be a company in Switzerland which is called Siegfried will double the capacity of the production of the active pharmaceutical ingredient. We plan to now offer APOQUEL to more veterinarians and also to offer more available product to existing veterinarians. At the same time, also the plan is to introduce the product in the rest of the markets where the product was put on hold because of product availability. So we are convinced that during 2016 we'll be able to meet all the demand from the market.
In terms of MFAs, I think MFAs in our case continue growing very strongly and we have the advantage of – that's right this is the diversity of our portfolio. It's not only diversity in terms of therapeutic areas or in terms of different types of products, but also within the MFAs we have a lot of diversity. And for products that will be maybe facing some challenge because of changes on the approach of the use of antibiotics, and I mentioned in the medical important antibiotics in MFAs with indication of a growth promotion, this will be eliminated but in our portfolio we also have a non-medical important antibiotics in MFAs that can be a good replacement for those that will be eliminated. We have in total in MFAs $500 million in sales and we grew operationally in 2015 by 8%.
So definitely we expect that those are probably the only indication of growth promotion which are medically important for human health that will have an impact in the revenues but this impact will be minimum. Next question, please.
Operator
We'll go next to Mark Schoenebaum with Evercore ISI.
Mark J. Schoenebaum - Evercore ISI
Hey, Paul. My email went up during your prepared remarks. I just wanted to say that it was really a brutally awesome prepared remarks section, especially the part about how we should reverse the alphabet, I love that. That's a great idea. But in all seriousness, I had a bunch of questions, but I'll limit it to 1.5 because most people have been doing it. Number one, given all the opacity that – you guys have tried to do everything you can to make it clear but this the confusion, I guess, that FX potentially creates, why not synthetically hedge against the effects on that at least in that net income line especially after the turmoil this year, although you guys have done a great job helping us understand the effect.
And then number two, maybe I missed this, but I didn't hear you break out APOQUEL sales on 4Q. I was wondering if you could. I apologize if I just missed it, if you could break those out in the U.S. and also the rest of world. And if you already answered that one, then my question would be the 6% to 8% normalized organic operational growth, what are the components of that for 2016 that you see? Thanks.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President

Sure, I'll start with the FX. I think when you're looking at trying to hedge operations around the world against foreign currencies, you have two choices. You can either, in non-technical terms, let it fly, which is what we do with respect to operations like many, many other multinational companies do, or you can attempt to hedge. If you hedge, you hedge within a quarter, and the analysis that we've done has suggested that you're essentially chasing down. You limit the cost of the hedges, ultimately make it like a less than fruitful exercise. Now others will tell you that they can do it, and that's okay. That would be their point of view. I point out that a couple of the currencies that tend to be the most volatile, there are not markets for us to go out and hedge. I think they're not deep enough. They're not efficient enough. And so you wouldn't be able to fully offset that.
I think I love your word there, opacity. I might have mispronounced that. We're trying our best to let the market follow along with as much of the information that we have that we can share with you so you can decide how we're performing. We do now, and we will continue to manage ourselves on an operational basis, meaning a constant currency basis. And I will hope against hope perhaps that at some point in the future here we'll see some more stability in the foreign exchange rates, and that we'll enjoy the positive upside, not from an operational perspective, but from a reported perspective of currency, FX rates going in the opposite direction.
Juan, do you want to take the APOQUEL sales, or would you like me to?
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
The APOQUEL sales, I think we had more than $100 million in 2015. It's about $110 million. This was below initial expectations. And the only reason for that was that ensuring that we have enough product to supply to customers, and not increasing the number of customers having access until we have the certainty that the product would be available. Now we're having a situation that we increase significantly the production, and we'll be able to increase the deliveries to our customers. Globally in international markets, I think we had about $40 million, and then the rest was in the U.S. But it's important to understand that in international markets it was very limited number of countries where we have the product available in the market.
You also asked about components of our organic growth, 6% to 8%, and Paul will provide the details of this.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Sure, I'll start. First of all, we expect to continue to be able to take consistent price across our portfolio. That's a driver. Second is there's a significant impact from new products in 2016, which frankly will be an even bigger impact on 2017, and then just performance of our portfolio. When I say new products, I'm focusing on the ones that you can see that make a difference. I'd point out that we have lots of new products that we don't talk about necessarily individually and maybe individually don't move the needle, but in the aggregate they sure do. 6% to 8% normalized operational growth in revenue next year would be terrific, and then again going into 2017 new products help even more.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
And, Mark, let me correct the total revenue that we generated internationally. Internationally was $20 million and then the rest was in the U.S. And I want to insist that in the international markets we have very limited number of markets and also limited supply. So the potential in both U.S. and international is much higher. So next question, please.
Operator
We'll go next to David Risinger with Morgan Stanley.
David R. Risinger - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC

Yes, thanks very much. My questions are financial. Obviously, you've covered a lot of ground on the business and the outlook. So, Paul, two questions. First, could you please discuss the outlook for 2016 cash flow, including cash flow from operations and then planned uses of cash? And then second, if you could, just comment on the quarterly progression throughout the year, just to make sure that we set up our models appropriately and we understand the different variables to consider. Thanks very much.
Paul S. Herendeen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Sure, I'll start with the discussion around expected cash flow. Recall that we try to call them out each and every quarter. We have a large amount of expenses that we're incurring with respect to: one, the standup from Pfizer; second, the operational efficiency initiative; and now we add to the list a potential true-up of our international taxes in light of the EC's comments.
If you look at our guidance tables, we call out the amount or the expected amount of the acquisition costs that we expect to incur in 2016 and then again in 2017. Those are I would call them – they're not normal and they will go away, and most of them will go away towards the latter part of 2016. But in 2016 it's a fairly significant call on our cash.
Secondarily, we continue to be in a phase of investing in our supply chain. We continue to invest capital there, so our CapEx is tracking at a rate that exceeds our ongoing depreciation rate, so net-net we continue to invest there. Of course, we called out that we now have a program that everybody can do the math, where at least the current expectation is we're purchasing shares at the rate of $75 million a quarter. It's $300 million this year plus our dividend. You can do that math. And those are other than our earnings are the things that you need to take into consideration when thinking about our cash flow.
I don't want to stop without speaking about efficiency of working capital. That is something that is to come. It's not something that you would see necessarily in 2015 and not in an enormous way in 2016. By the end of this quarter, we expect to have our ERP system up and running in all of our locations around the world, which is going to give us the ability to then implement tools, to much better manage primarily our investment in our inventories. Our receivables, I think we do a pretty good job there, and we certainly do the same things as everyone else with respect to payables. But we will not start to see some maybe significant cash flow from the improvement in cost of working capital really until 2017.
I wasn't specific there, David. I wasn't specific for the reason we don't want to provide specific guidance with respect to free cash flow, but I believe we've provided each of the components that will enable you to look out to 2016, 2017, and then beyond. I think when you get out into the latter part of this decade, our depreciation should start to normalize at a level close to our depreciation amount. I'll stop there.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
You also asked about the quarterly progression for 2016. Let me provide a couple of comments here. So first we expect that the new product launches will have no impact in the first quarter and we expect that these products ramping up during the year. Also APOQUEL, we expect that the biggest impact we'll see from the second quarter of 2016 as we also extend the product availability in the markets where the product has been already introduced, and we also launch in new markets.
In terms of expenses of course, also our efficiency program, will have much more impact in the second half than in the first half, because in the second half, we plan really to complete most of the actions that we took as part of the announcements that we made in May, and this also will have a positive impact in our results in the second half of the year. Next question please.

Operator
We'll go next to Kathy Miner with Cowen & Company.
Kathy M. Miner - Cowen & Co. LLC
Thank you, good morning. Two questions, one first on PHARMAQ. When you acquired the company, you had stated that it was growing about 17%. Is that still a good estimate going forward, or could it be higher given their late stage pipeline that you talked about? And also do you continue to expect it to be neutral to EPS this year and then accretive thereafter, or could that accelerate?
And the second question just has to do on trends outside of the U.S. in livestock. We saw the issue in France last year where they changed the legislation on antibiotics. Are there any other areas that we should look for in 2016 where there may be similar changes? Thank you.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
So Thank you, Kathy, for the questions. In PHARMAQ, what we communicated is that we plan to generate that revenue for $100 million in 2016 and $125 million in 2017 and at the end of the year PHARMAQ reported revenues of close to $80 million, so we see a significant increase in terms of our revenues.
What we saw during the due diligence when we acquire in terms of the pipeline, it's performing now with the launch of the product in Chile that it was under this emergency license. And we will continue progressing in the plans that we have for PHARMAQ. So we are very excited about the opportunities of PHARMAQ. We are working also in terms of integrating the two companies, but ensuring that PHARMAQ remains a leader in aquatic health with enough identity to maximize the relationship with the customers that they already built through many years.
In terms of the comments that you made, in France, definitely in 2015 we saw an impact because of the change of the legislation in France. This was affecting antibiotics. We expect also that antibiotics will continue having discussions and restrictions in some of the markets. This has been incorporated in our guidance for 2016 and 2017. And we also think that the projections that external sources are making about the total animal health industry and also the growth in antibiotics are consistent with what with our projections. So the industry will be growing about 5%. Antibiotics is expected to grow at half of this rate. The advantage for Zoetis is that it will have in our portfolio, antibiotics which are injectables, which are considered as premium antibiotics that are kept by veterinarians as a resource to ensure that they are treating and in some cases protecting also animals against infections.
So we are confident that the impact that it will have in antibiotics will be lower in our revenue, but in any case all these elements have been incorporated in our projections. Next question, please.
Operator
We'll go next to Jeff Holford with Jefferies. Jeff, if you want to check your mute button please?
Jeffrey Holford - Jefferies LLC
Hi. Can you hear me now?
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Yes, we can.
Jeffrey Holford - Jefferies LLC
Okay. Great. Thank you. Good morning. I just want to ask a couple of questions around Sanofi and Boehringer. First off, if you expect that business combination or that potential business combination to have any impact on the competitive environment for you as you go forward into 2017 and beyond, any specific areas of concern or opportunity there? And then second, just as you got two European companies coming together there. You've talked very briefly in the past about potential inversions, lack of opportunities, that's potentially two less opportunities now. Just any updated thoughts there is that's really looking beyond you now to potentially look at any kind of inversions or spin-versions out there. Thank you.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director

Thank you, Jeff, for the question and definitely the Sanofi/BI merger will create a very strong competitor. It will be the second largest animal health company in our industry. But we don't think that the combination of the two companies will create additional competitive challenge to Zoetis. We have the scale, we have the diversity, and we have the business model that has been proven very successful in the past and will continue also being successful in the future. The productivity that we have in R&D is also showing very high levels. So we are confident that we'll continue growing in line, or faster than market. So we are projecting in fact in 2016 and 2017 we're growing faster than market despite of Sanofi/BI or despite of all these additional consolidations in our industry.
Sanofi and BI, they are two European companies that potentially can be, maybe an opportunity for tax inversion, but also creating significant anti-trust issues to Zoetis. So we continue assessing opportunities that, to further consolidate, not with the only objective of saving on tax, but a combination of synergies that we can generate in terms of revenue, in terms of costs, opportunities on reducing our effective tax rate, and definitely creating a value to the company. Next question, please.
Operator
Next we'll go for a follow-up with Kevin Ellich with Piper Jaffray.
Kevin K. Ellich - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Hey. I was just wondering if you could comment about the, I guess Juan Ramón, did you say you guys have – supply of SIMPARICA is ready for launch? I just wanted to make sure I had that right.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Yes. I said that SIMPARICA product is ready for launch and as soon as we have approval for FDA, we'll be launching that in the U.S. and also in Europe. So we have the product in our warehouses.
Operator
And it does appear we have no further questions. I'll return the floor to you, Juan Ramón, for closing remarks.
Juan Ramón Alaix - Chief Executive Officer & Director
Thank you very much. And thank you for joining us today. As we continue through 2016, we are determined to make the most of our business model, our interconnected capabilities and the fundamental drivers of growth in animal health. We'll complete our operational changes, becoming less complex, more efficient and more agile. And we'll invest in growth opportunities to strengthen our business. I am confident that these steps will help improve our margins, better serve our customers and build shareholder value over the long term. And I look forward to reporting to you on our progress in each of these areas. Thank you very much.
Operator
Okay. Ladies and gentlemen, this does conclude today's teleconference. A replay of today's call will be available in two hours by dialing 800-839-6980 for U.S. listeners and 402-220-6062 for international. Please disconnect your lines at this time, and have a wonderful day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.

If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Healthcare, Drug Manufacturers - Major, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All ZTS TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Healthcare and Biotech Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Healthcare and Biotech StocksMannKind: Assessing The Insurance Landscape For AfrezzaMNKD• Today, 9:22 PM • Spencer Osborne•9 CommentsADMA Biologics Follows Up On RI-002ADMA• Today, 9:17 PM • Strong Bio•1 CommentHerbalife: Shareholders Should Take Profits NowHLF• Today, 9:06 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•8 CommentsEXACT Sciences Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEXAS• Today, 8:30 PM • SA TranscriptsAmgen Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAMGN• Today, 6:02 PM • SA TranscriptsDon't Lose The Faith In ShireSHPG• Today, 5:33 PM • HealthBlogger'Sparks' A-Flyin'ONCE• Today, 5:28 PM • Strong BioCelgene: Gearing Up For New HighsCELG• Today, 4:36 PM • Taylor Dart•7 Comments3 Things In Biotech You Should Learn Today: July 25, 2017CELG, NVCR, PFE• Today, 4:33 PM • Zach Hartman, PhD•3 CommentsNektar Makes A Stride Forward In Resolving Autoimmune DiseasesNKTR• Today, 4:10 PM • Long Term BioAralez: A Quick Overview Of The Investment ThesisARLZ• Today, 3:56 PM • Avisol Capital Partners•6 CommentsSamsung Leaps Into Its First U.S. Biosimilars BattleJNJ, MRK, PFE• Today, 3:43 PM • EP Vantage•1 CommentGilead: Q2 Earnings PreviewGILD• Today, 3:40 PM • Jonathan Weber•17 CommentsAiming For A New Angle On Liquid BiopsyANPCY• Today, 3:38 PM • EP Vantage•1 CommentMerck's Keynote Falls Flat, And That's Just FineMRK• Today, 3:34 PM • EP Vantage•2 CommentsGenocea Biosciences's (GNCA) Conference Call On Positive GEN-003 Phase 2b Results - SlideshowGNCA• Today, 3:32 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentUltragenyx More Than Meets The Eye?RARE• Today, 3:03 PM • Strong BioVerastem Shows Long-Term Potential With Strong DYNAMO DataVSTM• Today, 2:49 PM • Emerging Equities•1 CommentBiotech Forum Daily Digest: Sector Meanders In Front Of EarningsAIMT, CBAY, CUR• Today, 2:22 PM • Bret Jensen•8 CommentsAmerican Shared Hospital Services: Solid Core Earnings And Exciting Growth Potential Offer ValueAMS• Today, 12:33 PM • Richard Greulich Jr., CFA•2 CommentsIntelliPharmaCeutics International - Very Low Downside And Huge UpsideIPCI• Today, 11:33 AM • Philip Mause•13 CommentsGilead Puts Up The Good Fight Once AgainGILD• Today, 10:10 AM • Long Term Bio•11 CommentsIs Aratana Your Porfolio's Best Friend?PETX• Today, 10:06 AM • Strong Bio•4 CommentsEli Lilly and Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLLY• Today, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsBiogen Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBIIB• Today, 9:14 AM • SA TranscriptsAbbVie's Long Shot At Proving Rova-T Doubters WrongABBV• Today, 7:29 AM • EP Vantage•3 CommentsLilly Hopes To Bloom Through Nektar AttractionLLY, NKTR• Today, 7:22 AM • EP Vantage•2 CommentsTheMaven Updates Large Insider Share RegistrationMVEN• Today, 6:09 AM • Donovan Jones•2 Comments3 New Developments Give Hope For Type I Diabetes SufferersCLBS• Yesterday, 4:59 PM • Christiana Friedman•3 CommentsQ2 Earnings Should Be The Catalyst For Valeant's Next Leg HigherVRX• Yesterday, 3:36 PM • Michael Lynch•81 CommentsI Think Gilead Is Worth More than $86 Per ShareGILD• Yesterday, 3:22 PM • Stephen Barnes•69 CommentsVertex Looks Attractive With New Positive Data, Acquisition BuzzVRTX• Yesterday, 2:35 PM • Avisol Capital Partners•3 CommentsRecent Buy: Gilead SciencesGILD• Yesterday, 1:45 PM • Fiscal Voyage•32 CommentsReata Pharmaceuticals (RETA) Cardinal Phase 2 Results And Update - SlideshowRETA• Yesterday, 1:14 PM • SA TranscriptsTime To Buy TevaTEVA• Yesterday, 1:06 PM • All American Investor•38 CommentsHerbalife: When An EPS Raise Isn't Really A RaiseHLF• Yesterday, 1:05 PM • Gary Milne•15 CommentsMerck: A Slow Growth Income Play With Moderate Growth PotentialMRK• Yesterday, 12:11 PM • William Stamm•11 CommentsAbiomed: This Debt-Free Medical Device Stock Is A Strong Buy In 2017ABMD• Yesterday, 12:05 PM • Gaurao Bhade•1 CommentZynerba Pharmaceuticals Could Run Up Due To Upcoming Key Catalysts: Our Idea Of The MonthZYNE• Yesterday, 12:03 PM • Bhavneesh Sharma, MBA•14 CommentsBiotech Forum Daily Digest: Dynavax Technologies' Moment Of Truth ArrivesCNCE, CYTX, DVAX• Yesterday, 10:52 AM • Bret Jensen•20 CommentsParatek Puts Skin In The Infection GamePRTK• Yesterday, 8:24 AM • Strong Bio•28 CommentsAnthem: Tread Carefully Into EarningsANTM• Yesterday, 8:20 AM • Benjamin HandlerSnippet Roundup: A Lingering Lingo And 2 More U.S. Green LightsGILD, JNJ, PRTK• Yesterday, 7:41 AM • EP VantageData Put A Dent In Ironwood's Expansion PlansIRWD• Yesterday, 7:26 AM • EP Vantage•1 CommentUpdates To Syros Pharmaceuticals ThesisSYRS• Sun, Jul. 23, 1:02 PM • Jonathan Faison•6 Comments3 Things In Biotech You Should Learn Today: July 23, 2017BMY, KITE, MRK• Sun, Jul. 23, 9:00 AM • Zach Hartman, PhD•8 CommentsAmgen And Novartis: First Mover Advantage Is A MustAMGN, NVS• Sun, Jul. 23, 2:21 AM • Long Term Bio•2 Comments3 Things In Biotech You Should Learn Today: July 22, 2017CSLLY, INCY, MRK• Sat, Jul. 22, 9:00 AM • Zach Hartman, PhD•9 CommentsUpdates To Insulet Thesis: Innovation And Growth ContinuePODD• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:26 AM • Jonathan Faison•13 CommentsIronwood Will Press On In The Good Fight Against GERDIRWD• Fri, Jul. 21, 5:26 PM • Long Term Bio•3 CommentsMannKind: Afrezza Scripts Stable At A Bit Above 300 - Will Ads Help?MNKD• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:15 PM • Spencer Osborne•73 CommentsIgnyta Lights The FireRXDX• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:28 PM • Strong Bio•2 CommentsWhy Ironwood's IW-3718 Is 'Refluxing' Into A Sea Of RedIRWD• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:32 PM • Life Sciences Millennial•18 CommentsNovartis's Q2 Results: Encouraging Signals Fully Reflected In ValuationNVS• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:17 PM • HealthBlogger•2 Comments2 Small Oncology Stocks That Could Rally Through Year-EndRXDX, TGTX• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:23 PM • Bret Jensen•20 CommentsROTY Edition 1 Volume 14: Updates And A Ninth PositionCBAY• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:14 PM • Jonathan Faison•3 CommentsTrevena (TRVN) Investor Presentation - SlideshowTRVN• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:09 PM • SA TranscriptsJohnson & Johnson Is A Defensive Stock And Should Be In All Portfolios, Income Or GrowthJNJ• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:17 PM • William Stamm•17 CommentsTesaro's Stock Dip Is Nothing To Be Afraid OfTSRO• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:03 PM • Kevin McAdams•3 CommentsUnited Therapeutics Losing The Crown Jewels; 20% EPS Downgrades AheadUTHR• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:32 AM • World's Greatest•9 CommentsAn Endocrinologist Explains Her View Of Tymlos And The Osteoporosis LandscapeRDUS• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:20 AM • Slingshot Insights•3 CommentsSirukumab's Panel And U.S. Decision For Medicines CompanyMDCO, JNJ, GSK• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:18 AM • EP Vantage•1 CommentAchaogen EscalatesAKAO• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:03 AM • Strong Bio•26 CommentsMedtronic's Diabetes Segment Generating ExcitementMDT• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:37 AM • The Non-Consensus•13 CommentsGilead Has Another Ace Up Its SleeveGILD• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:22 PM • Long Term Bio•52 CommentsMedtronic: A Dividend Aristocrat With Double-Digit Payout Growth PotentialMDT• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:19 PM • Simply Safe Dividends•15 CommentsMannKind: Afrezza Television Ad Debuts; What Investors Need To KnowMNKD• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:02 PM • Spencer Osborne•98 CommentsProtalix Is Undervalued With Upcoming CatalystsPLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:50 PM • Jesse Donovan•59 CommentsTitan Pharmaceuticals: Just Be PatientTTNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:30 PM • Matthew Burdeshaw•17 CommentsQuidel To Acquire Triage Assets From Alere DivestitureQDEL• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:34 PM • Donovan JonesCymaBay Therapeutics' Strong Cash Raise Points To Near-Term UpsideCBAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:56 PM • Jonathan Faison•5 CommentsVivus Settlement Could Clue In Orexigen InvestorsOREX, VVUS• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:41 PM • Spencer Osborne•1 CommentIronwood Pharmaceuticals (IRWD) IW-3718 Phase IIb Clinical Trial Results - SlideshowIRWD• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:59 PM • SA TranscriptsAerie Pharmaceuticals (AERI) Roclatan Mercury 1 Phase 3 12-month Topline Results - SlideshowAERI• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:56 PM • SA TranscriptsIs The FDA Biotech's Best Friend?BDSI, ENDP, FOLD• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:54 AM • Bret Jensen•29 Comments123456...468Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Robert Half International's (RHI) CEO Harold Messmer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RHI•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Chegg's (CHGG) CEO Daniel Rosensweig on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CHGG•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Carlisle Companies' (CSL) CEO Chris Koch on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CSL•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:23 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Akamai Technologies' (AKAM) CEO Tom Leighton on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AKAM•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:20 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Wynn Resorts (WYNN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WYNN•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Aspen's (ASPU) CEO Michael Mathews on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASPU•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:18 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Rocky Brands' (RCKY) CEO Jason Brooks on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RCKY•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:13 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moelis & Co's (MC) CEO Kenneth Moelis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MC•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:08 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Invuity's (IVTY) CEO Philip Sawyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


IVTY•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Dolby Laboratories' (DLB) CEO Kevin Yeaman on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DLB•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Juniper Networks (JNPR) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


JNPR•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:39 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Celestica's (CLS) CEO Rob Mionis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CLS•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Enterprise Financial Services' (EFSC) CEO Jim Lally on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EFSC•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Compagnie Generale des Etablissements Michelin's (MGDDF) CEO Jean-Dominique Senard on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MGDDF•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:07 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Texas Instruments (TXN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TXN•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Chipotle Mexican Grill (CMG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CMG•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:01 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




AT&T (T) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


T•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•3 Comments 



Hawaiian Holdings' (HA) CEO Mark Dunkerley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HA•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:34 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mullen Group's (MLLGF) CEO Murray Mullen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MLLGF•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Shutterfly's (SFLY) CEO Christopher North on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SFLY•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Southern Missouri Bancorp's (SMBC) CEO Greg Steffens on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SMBC•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  7:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Liberty Property Trust's (LPT) CEO William. Hankowsky on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LPT•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  7:23 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Avery Dennison's (AVY) CEO Mitchell Butier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AVY•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  6:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Potlatch Corporation's (PCH) CEO Mike Covey on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PCH•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  6:41 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Consumer Portfolio Services' (CPSS) CEO Charles Bradley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPSS•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  6:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Pacific Premier Bancorp's (PPBI) CEO Steve Gardner on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PPBI•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  6:10 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Eli Lilly & Co. (LLY) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LLY•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Flagstar Bancorp's (FBC) CEO Sandro DiNello on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FBC•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  5:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




HomeStreet's (HMST) CEO Mark Mason on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HMST•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  5:38 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Spectris' (SEPJF) CEO John O'Higgins on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SEPJF•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  5:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4435Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 














Juan Ramon Alaix Presents at 2017 J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference | Zoetis 




























 







Zoetis.com uses cookies to improve your experience when browsing our website. By continuing to use this site, you are agreeing to their use. To find out more, view our cookie policy. 


Agree











































News & MediaPress Releases
In The News
Feature Stories
Photo Gallery
Video Gallery
Media Kit
Media Contacts






Home / News & Media / Feature Stories / Juan Ramón Alaix Presents at 2017 J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference 



Share
Share on twitter
Share on facebook
Share on linkedin
Share on google_plusone_share
Share on email





Print





Text Size





 


Feature Stories


Most Recent
Zoetis
Companion Animals
Farm Animals
Corporate
Products & Services





2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012







< Prev
Next >








 January 11, 2017 Juan Ramón Alaix Presents at 2017 J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference










Chief Executive Officer Juan Ramón Alaix presented at the J.P. Morgan Global Healthcare Conference on Wednesday, January 11th, marking the third year in a row that Zoetis has spoken at this important industry event. The meeting, which spans four days and is held in San Francisco, CA each year, is an investor event for the healthcare sector, attended by more than 9,000 pharmaceutical executives, investors and financial analysts.
Sustainable Growth and Value Creation in Animal Health 
In the Zoetis presentation, Mr. Alaix provided an update on the animal health industry and shared Zoetis’ achievements over the past few years, reinforcing the company as an attractive investment opportunity for shareholders.
Mr. Alaix spoke about the sustainable and predictable long-term growth drivers of the $30 billion animal health industry. Population growth, a rising middle class and increasing urbanization all contribute to making animal health one of the more appealing and resilient segments of healthcare.
Highlighting Zoetis’ four-year journey of achievements and results, Mr. Alaix stressed that the strength of the company’s business model and diverse portfolio has served as the foundation for Zoetis’ success as a stand-alone animal health company. He also discussed how Zoetis has become a leaner and more efficient business with increasing margins and less complexity, continually delivered on their long-term value proposition for investors – and how the company remains committed to those principles for value creation in the future.
Mr. Alaix shared plans for building market leadership through investing in R&D; supporting the launch of key new products with manufacturing investments, marketing programs and field force expansions; and investing in business development activities that will enhance the Zoetis product portfolio, strengthen the company’s presence in emerging markets and expand complementary businesses. He also reinforced the commitment to return excess capital to shareholders.
“From the beginning of Zoetis, we have communicated and delivered a clear value proposition for our shareholders,” said Mr. Alaix, “I am very proud of our ability to achieve our goals, and as we look to the future, these same principles remain the foundation of our commitment to shareholders.”
View the replay
If you would like to hear a replay and see the slides from Mr. Alaix’s presentation at the J.P. Morgan conference, you can access these materials on the Investors section of Zoetis.com.




 1Adjusted Net Income is a non-GAAP measure and defined as the corresponding reported U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) income statement line item, excluding purchase accounting adjustments, acquisition-related costs and certain significant items. The adjusted net income measure is not, and should not be viewed as, substitute for U.S. GAAP reported net income attributable to Zoetis.




Tags: 

Animal Health, Corporate, Events, Investors, Zoetis

 

Media Contact
For media inquiries, click here
 









                Select a Country

zoetis.com
zoetisZO.com



Argentina
Australia
Austria
Belgium (French)
Belgium (Dutch)
Brazil
Bolivia
Bulgaria
Canada
Chile
China
Colombia
Costa Rica
Croatia
Czech Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Greece
Hungary
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Japan
Latvia
Lithuania
Malaysia
Mexico
Morocco
Netherlands
New Zealand
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Russia
Serbia
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
Ukraine
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Vietnam
 You are leaving the country website to access another site in the group.
Regulatory constraints and medical practices vary from country to country. Consequently, the information provided on the site in which you enter may not be suitable for use in your country. 






Home

|Sitemap

|Privacy Policy

|Cookie Policy

|Terms of Use









Juan Ramon Alaix - New York, NY | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Juan Ramon Alaix in New York, NY


Juan Ramon Alaix

                                                                           Intelius found that Juan Ramon Alaix  is  a male between 40 and 50 years old from New York, NY.  We have connected them to
                2 addresses,
                2 phones,
                and 1 relative or associate.
         





Also Known As

Juan-Ramon  Alaix


Get Report Now

Age

Juan Ramon Alaix is in his 40s

Juan Has Lived In

New York, NY

Juan's Relatives

Adriana Alaix







Juan Ramon Alaix



GenderMale



Professional Status
President and General Manager, Animal Health Business Unit at Pfizer Inc



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Juan? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Juan, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Juan Ramon Alaix
Get a Criminal Check on Juan Ramon Alaix
Get a Public Record Report on Juan Ramon Alaix
Get a People Search Report on Juan Ramon Alaix


Juan Ramon Alaix's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Juan Ramon Alaix has lived as well as Juan Ramon Alaix's phone numbers and email addresses.




Juan Ramon Alaix Has Lived in 1 States
New York Address for Juan Ramon Alaix


235 E 4*** S* 

New York, NY


Has Lived In

New York, NY


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Juan Ramon Alaix

(212) ***-**** - New York, NY 
(212) ***-**** - New York, NY 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Juan Ramon Alaix

j*************x@***.com


Get Email Report




Juan Ramon Alaix's Professional Information
Information regarding Juan Ramon Alaix's professional history.  Find out previous places Juan Ramon Alaix has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Juan Ramon Alaix Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: Pfizer Inc
               Title: President and General Manager, Animal Health Business Unit
Juan Ramon Alaix's Experience
Title: President and General Manager, Animal Health Business Unit
               Company: Pfizer Inc
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 25,000 to less than 100,000
Additional Professional Information on Juan Ramon Alaix

 See Juan Ramon Alaix's LinkedIn Profile



Juan Ramon Alaix's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Juan Ramon Alaix


Juan Ramon Alaix's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Juan Ramon Alaix's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Juan Alaix
Username Matches

                  JuanAlaix
                  AlaixJuan
                  Juan.Alaix
                  Alaix.Juan
                  Juan_Alaix
                  Alaix_Juan
                  Juan-Alaix
                  Alaix-Juan
                  JAlaix
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
J Alaix







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.













Feedinfo News Service - INTERVIEW: Zoetis CEO Discusses Company's Singular Focus on Animal Health


























                                 










 > Global NewsCategories: Animal Health |  Corporate News






































INTERVIEW: Zoetis CEO Discusses Company's Singular Focus on Animal Health 

Source: Feedinfo News Service 

(dated 26/01/2015) 




26 January 2015 - Only established as a new company two years ago, Zoetis today claims the leading spot in the global animal health industry. 




At the recent J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference, Zoetis CEO Juan Ramón Alaix stated that his company is 35% bigger in terms of annual sales than its closest large competitor Merck, and enjoys a market share of close to 20%.
"We are generating a growth which is faster than our competitors," Alaix told his San Francisco audience. "And we are not only leading in total, but you see that we are leading in many different dimensions. In terms of geographies, we have a very strong position; also a very strong position in terms of the therapeutic areas which are relevant for our customers in animal health, and we have a very strong position in terms of species."
Zoetis was heavily featured under the media spotlight during the second half of 2014: the company obtained a conditional green light for its vaccine for the prevention of PEDv, a virus which significantly impacted pig herds last year. It also announced plans to acquire the companion animal assets of Abbott Animal Health for USD 255 million. Activist investor William Ackman's Pershing Square Capital Holdings also revealed a stake in Zoetis, opening up the rumor mill again. And finally, Zoetis held an investor day in November during which growth plans were outlined as well as financial goals through 2017.
Feedinfo News Service spoke to Juan Ramón Alaix and asked him to reflect back on the company developments of 2014 and share his views on industry issues.
[Feedinfo News Service] Mr. Alaix, you were appointed Chief Executive Officer of Zoetis in July 2012. What lessons would you say you have learned from this position?
[Juan Ramón Alaix] I’ve learned many lessons in my time as CEO of Zoetis, but perhaps the most important is the value that we can bring to our customers and shareholders through our singular focus on animal health. This focus differentiates us from our largest competitors and gives us an advantage. I recently spoke to the head of one of our largest customers about our “singular focus.” He told me that they were initially skeptical when we became independent, but he said they have seen a definite difference and advantage in the way we operate, deal with them and focus on their needs. Every colleague at Zoetis knows they can have a big impact on our company’s success and we are focused on doing even better.





[Feedinfo News Service] Can you provide a brief overview of Zoetis’ scale with regard to the farm animal side of your business? How does it compare to companion animal health and diagnostics?
[Juan Ramón Alaix] We have the most diverse portfolio in the USD 23 billion animal health market, spanning livestock and companion animal products. In 2013, 65% of our sales were in the livestock animal segment and 35% were in the companion animal segment (2013 total sales were USD 4.6 billion). In terms of market share by species, we are number one in cattle and swine, number two in poultry and number two in companion animal products. We are also quite diverse in terms of product categories. To give you some background, our portfolio ranked number one in anti-infectives, which represented approximately 29% of our 2013 revenue. We ranked number two in medicated feed additives, which represented approximately 10% of our revenue; number two in vaccines, which represented approximately 27% of our revenue and our portfolio ranked third in parasiticides, which represented approximately 15% of our revenues. 
[Feedinfo News Service] Zoetis has a very diverse portfolio with more than 300 product lines. Boon or bane?
[Juan Ramón Alaix] While it can be complex to manage 300 product lines, having a diverse portfolio provides strength in serving our varied customer needs, and it is a benefit to our financial performance. We leverage our broad portfolio of products and customer relationships to provide the most relevant and meaningful solutions that customers need. Our portfolio also helps us maintain steady and durable revenue streams. Since we are not dependent on any single product for a large portion of our revenues, there is less volatility and potential risk. For instance, our largest product is only 7% of our revenue and our top 25 products account for 59%. 
[Feedinfo News Service] When activist investor Bill Ackman acquired a stake in Zoetis in November (roughly 10%), it was speculated that Ackman was pushing for a sale of Zoetis. Moreover, Zoetis CFO Paul Herendeen in November said that, as a public company, Zoetis is "for sale every day" if someone made the right offer. Could you let us know what your stance is? And should Zoetis be subject to an acquisition in 2015, what ideal takeover candidate profile are you looking for?

Juan Ramón AlaixCEOZoetis
[Juan Ramón Alaix] We believe Zoetis has the business model, operational discipline and strategies in place to create shareholder value, but we welcome the perspectives of all shareholders.  We are focused on our performance and execution, and wouldn’t comment on rumor or speculation about potential acquisitions or takeovers.
[Feedinfo News Service] In November, Zoetis also announced it would acquire a portfolio of pet drugs from Abbott Laboratories for approximately USD 255 million. Can we consider Abbott - mainly veterinary surgical products - as a complementary business for Zoetis? And with regard to Zoetis' own M&A strategy in general, can we expect more bolt-on acquisitions of complementary businesses?
[Juan Ramón Alaix] The addition of Abbott Animal Health assets is an excellent complement to the Zoetis companion animal business and addresses the challenges our customers face today in effectively raising and caring for animals that are living longer and receiving more intensive medical and surgical treatment. This acquisition also strengthens our pain portfolio and our diagnostics business so we can deliver more customized solutions to veterinarians. We have certainly added complementary businesses to strengthen our company in the past, but as a matter of policy, we do not comment or speculate on potential M&A activity. In order for us to enter into any new space, it would have to make strategic sense and create sustained value for our business and shareholders. 




"We have the most diverse portfolio in the USD 23 billion animal health market ... we are number one in cattle and swine, number two in poultry and number two in companion animal products."     - Juan Ramón Alaix

[Feedinfo News Service] Zoetis received conditional regulatory approval last summer to market vaccines for porcine epidemic diarrhea virus. Do you think PEDv is a wildcard for 2015? Is the company ready to supply across North America should there be a resurgence? On the contrary, if PEDv doesn't resurface, would you consider all the effort/time/resources put into the PEDv vaccine development as lost? 
[Juan Ramón Alaix] PEDv was a significant issue for swine producers in the U.S. in 2014 and increasingly in other markets around the world. We were very pleased to be able to provide our U.S. customers with a conditionally licensed PED vaccine that could help address this devastating disease and demonstrate our commitment to these customers. Bringing this vaccine to market quickly – in a little more than a year since the disease was identified in the U.S. – exemplifies our commitment to supporting veterinarians and livestock producers with high-quality vaccines that can help control the evolving and complex threat of emerging infectious diseases. Regardless of what happens with the spread of PEDv in 2015, we would consider the resources put into the development of this vaccine as essential to maintaining our role as an innovative leader in animal health. Our customers had an urgent need that required a rapid response, and our people used their experience, knowledge and expertise to meet the challenge.
[Feedinfo News Service] Zoetis also recently announced the reintroduction of Zoamix® (zoalene) for the prevention and control of coccidiosis in poultry (after a 5-year stop). The U.S. poultry industry loses an estimated USD 600 million a year to coccidiosis. Do you see that number decreasing next year with Zoetis' coccidiosis management strategy and action plan returning to the forefront? 
[Juan Ramón Alaix] Coccidiosis is an ever present disease and the industry needs all the tools it can get to manage it. Bringing Zoamix® back will allow for new management strategies to address this challenge, and allow producers some new flexibility in designing protocols thanks to the unique characteristics of the product. A new coccidiosis management tool will also allow for the resting of other products in order to protect their efficacy. Zoamix® can also be used in programs where the use of antibiotics is restricted. It will be an extremely valuable tool in these settings, as these producers have fewer tools to rely on to manage the disease. 





[Feedinfo News Service] Zoetis produces therapeutic antibiotics to treat animal diseases, but is the company feeling any indirect consequences of the increasing global pressure on the use of in-feed antibiotics (AGPs)? 
[Juan Ramón Alaix] At Zoetis we believe antibiotic medicines are a precious resource and by using them responsibly today, we will work to help protect their efficacy for tomorrow. Zoetis supports the responsible use of antibiotic medicines in animals and in people. We believe that veterinary professionals should be involved in decisions about the use of antibiotic medicines in animals for several reasons: to protect both animal and human health; to assure the safety of the food supply; and to help reduce the risk of resistance. We are committed to supporting our veterinary and livestock farmer customers with the knowledge and tools to use antibiotic medicines responsibly and properly according to their labeling. We comply with all regulatory requirements and work with authorities to ensure that appropriate label precautions are in place to assure the safety of these products for animals, their caregivers and the public.
[Feedinfo News Service] There has been some scrutiny recently on Zoetis' antibiotic ceftiofur and the frequency with which it's being misused on farms across America. How can you explain this?  What is the company putting in place to reassure its customers, and to another extent the consumer? 
"Since we are not dependent on any single product for a large portion of our revenues, there is less volatility and potential risk. Our largest product is only 7% of our revenue and our top 25 products account for 59%."     - Juan Ramón Alaix
[Juan Ramón Alaix] All ceftiofur products are FDA-approved for specific animal diseases and available only through veterinary prescription. We think the role of the veterinarian is critical in this issue. Problems arise when the product is administered incorrectly and without the involvement of a veterinarian. We urge our customers to strictly follow drug treatment protocols and withhold times, and to only market animals that are healthy. We strongly support judicious use of antibiotics by providing producers and veterinarians with ongoing education and training so that ceftiofur products are used appropriately and within the label guidelines outlined by FDA. Zoetis advocates for the involvement of a veterinarian in any animal health decisions as part of an ongoing veterinary-client-patient relationship. Zoetis also sponsors the largest antibiotic resistance monitoring program in the animal health industry to ensure ceftiofur is used carefully and remains effective for the diseases for which it is a cure.  We also have a number of resources to help our customers keep their animals healthy in the first place, as well as robust protocols and training in case antibiotic treatment is needed to restore animal health and protect the food supply.   
[Feedinfo News Service] Mr. Alaix, to conclude: animal genetics has been mentioned as a big focus for Zoetis going forward. Can you let us know where the company is headed in this area?
[Juan Ramón Alaix] Zoetis is focused on the role of genetics as a key driver for the health and productivity of livestock. With the world’s need for protein growing and resources at a premium, producers need to use all the tools they have to produce more with less. Genetics fits very well with the many health and productivity solutions that Zoetis provides to producers across the globe. Zoetis is well positioned to drive the adoption of this technology by creating new information based products and educating our customers on the application of genetics. 





























More Alerts from 26/01/2015










 
 
       © Feedinfo News Service 2017 - All rights reserved       



                                 









  Juan Ramón Alaix, CEO Success Stories | Merryck & Co      Juan Ramón Alaix, CEO Success Stories | Merryck & Co   “Having someone there who had a deep understanding of my context and the certain knowledge that they would support me to achieve my business objectives was enormously helpful. I benefitted commercially and practically from their help.— Ex Group Audit Director, Lloyds Banking Group“Despite some initial skepticism my retreat was a very powerful experience. My mentor was really effective in helping me develop both professionally and personally and there has been a lasting impact on the way I operate.”— Stéphanie Nguyen Qui, Head of HR & Admin, GDF SUEZ Energy International“As a first time CEO the support from my Merryck mentor was invaluable. The retreat was challenging and forced me to think hard about what was truly important.  The relationship gave me a structure to deal with all of the things that were swirling around in my head, and helped me to deal with difficult situations more effectively.”— Steve Clarke, CEO, WH Smith“My overall experience of Merryck was excellent. Despite some initial hesitation I found the retreat to be a hugely worthwhile investment, setting up a strong platform for our on-going mentoring relationship. I have no hesitation in recommending a Merryck mentor to anyone in a senior leadership role.”— Tom Cronk, SVP Commercial Operations, ARM“I only have positive things to say about Merryck. My mentor found just the right balance between encouragement and constructive challenge. He managed at one and the same time to get close to the business and my personal challenges, and also to retain a distance that allowed him always to bring fresh perspectives.”— Steve Riley, CEO and President of GDF SUEZ Energy UK-Europe“My retreat was fantastic. I really needed to sort some things out and I got clarity and perspective that were invaluable. I have implemented the ideas that came up and the results are dramatic. I feel like I have found an extra gear.”— CEO, Banking“When I took on a senior leadership role for a major pharmaceutical company, turbulent market conditions required wholesale change within the business.  Merryck’s focus on strategic and operational issues helped me lead to a successful outcome. The perspective challenge that I gained from my mentor helped me attain excellent business results and equipped me for my next role as a public company CEO.”— CEO, Healthcare Company“My mentor understands the challenges that CEO’s face and provides wisdom based on his experience and knowledge. Merryck & Co provides a unique service by mentoring CEOs through CEOs. I thoroughly recommend their  service to any leader looking for an external support network.”— Group CEO, Financial Services Company“I have experienced various consultants and coaches over the years, but feel that the balance Merryck brings is phenomenally powerful.”— CEO, FTSE 250 Company“My mentor has had a huge impact on my personal development and my businesses performance over the last 12-18 months. He has significantly helped me develop as a leader and always has my best interests at heart. I would thoroughly recommend Merryck & Co.”— Paul Flaum, COO, Whitbread Hotels & Restaurants“I found my mentor very practical, with deep executive experience coupled with a great approach to problem solving. The mentoring process has helped me to achieve greater clarity, has challenged my thinking and broadened my views in many areas.”— CEO, Energy Company“During my period of engagement with Merryck & Co, I found their support enormously beneficial to me personally and in delivering benefits to our organization. They operate with the highest professional standards but with an approach that is designed around the mentee’s individual needs. I also benefited from their network events and access across a number of their mentors when necessary. I would have no hesitation in recommending them.”— CEO, Marketing Solutions and Publishing“I was something of a cowboy, running the largest business in the company.  My mentor helped me not only as a successful unit leader, but in most effectively partnering with the Board and peers at the highest levels of the organization.”— Division President, ITT Industries“I was skeptical at first but my eyes were opened during the retreat – an intense, difficult but deeply rewarding experience. I have taken a close look at how I lead, and now understand the power of enabling others to excel. I can’t recommend the Merryck process highly enough.”— Global Head, Global Chemicals Company“Your focus on profit and performance with an appreciation of the demands of the CEO really attracted me. My retreat was outstanding. Our work together has broadened my horizons to the extent that my role as a leader has forever changed for the better.”— Managing Director, Investment Bank“My company is growing at a breakneck speed, and I am one of the few females at the C-level in my industry. Having a Merryck mentor who has helped me scale the organization and navigate senior leadership as a woman and who brings real-life experience has meant the difference in our company’s revenues and in my sanity.”— Leslie Bradshaw, Former President, COO & Co-Founder of JESS3, Now COO of Guide“This isn’t for someone who wants to make incremental changes, or do something they are already doing slightly better. It’s for the leader who wants to make a serious difference.”— President, Energy Company“My Merryck mentor’s driving mission was to help me succeed. Trusting him gave me the confidence to work through a variety of issues with a very capable and seasoned professional whose only concern was me. The best analogy I can think of is the relationship between a golfer and his caddy. Except in this case, the caddy was a former champion who had played the game at its highest levels.”— Brian O’Malley, Chief Executive Officer, Domino Foods“I found Merryck’s support enormously beneficial to me personally and in delivering benefits to our organization. They operate with the highest professional standards but with an approach that is designed around the client’s individual needs.”— Patrick Martell, CEO, St IvesBlogPODCASTSPressPUBLICATIONSBlogPopular PostsPerceived Weirdness IndexCulture ChangeMargaret Heffernan contributes to the Radio 4 programme ‘The Joy of 9 to 5′Mentoring cross-culturallyThe fears of a CEO post-acquisitionArchive2014OctoberJulyJuneMay2013October    Jun 11, 2014The Willingness to Recognize What He Still Needed to Learnby David Reimer, CEO, Merryck & Co AmericasAs the leader of a highly complex global business unit with general management responsibilities spanning R&D, business development, and new product marketing, Juan Ramón Alaix proved he could effectively run a business.But was he ready to be a CEO?After rising through the leadership ranks, with years of progressively more demanding and broader-in-scale responsibilities under their belts, many motivated and high-achieving leaders will immediately answer that question with a resounding “Yes!”But often it’s those who are willing to say “not yet” who end up being most successful in the top job.That is Alaix’s story.In a remarkably forthright “How I Did It” segment for the Harvard Business Review, Alaix shared how his willingness to recognize what he still needed to learn, along with a commitment to his ongoing professional development, has helped him be successful as CEO of Zoetis, the animal health business that spun off from Pfizer in an IPO in 2011.The kind of frank honesty by Alaix—with himself and with others—shows a level of self-awareness and vulnerability that is not always typical among rising CEOs. In fact, a lot of CEOs don’t like to admit they weren’t born as fully-formed executives.“Often,” one Seattle-based CMO told us, “a CEO isn’t willing to show that kind of vulnerability publicly, even though his team—and possibly the entire organization—can see a different side to the leader.” As he observed, a CEO who can’t show vulnerability is in fact one who could benefit the most from ongoing development.A recent HBR blog, “To Create a Real Connection, Show Vulnerability,” by Michael Simmons elaborates on this and explores the mistaken assumption that if people find out who we really are underneath, they’d remove themselves from our lives.Simmons writes: “Only presenting an idealized version of ourselves separates us from others.” The reality is, if we share the ups and downs of our human experience in the right way in the right context, we build deeper connections.Alaix’s journey from successful business president to successful CEO included a relationship and connection with Patrick Gournay, a Merryck Mentor who previously held the top job at companies like Arc International, The Body Shop International, and regional leadership roles at The Danone Group.An independent outsider who had been through it himself—and knew what Alaix would be facing—Gournay had no stake in the game at Pfizer. His only agenda was to help Alaix take a step back and get clear on what the role would require of him, what would be different and how he would need to adapt.After reading Juan Ramon’s story, a CEO of a $200M business shared with us this response: “If someone with Mr. Alaix’s background and accomplishments had no problem admitting he could benefit from training, then there should be no shame in my doing the same.”So yes, it takes a willingness and an openness. But the results speak for themselves. As Alaix put it: “I’m a big believer in preparation and the need for training, no matter where you are in your career or how high in a corporation you’ve already risen…The time I spend getting ready for a challenge and the openness I have to coaching are investments that always pay me back.”It’s an interesting benchmark for a leader: How honest is he or she willing to be about their own professional development?Click the link to view our recent blog: What Can Mindfulness Do For You?, or check back for more on business leadership, team development, and thought leadership.Original Article Source 0    Please enable JavaScript to view the comments powered by Disqus.
  







 






Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v




























ramon alaix - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











Alaix at Amazon - Shop hundreds of favorite brands.



Ad
 ·
Amazon.com/​fashion



Shop hundreds of favorite brands. Free Shipping on Qualified Orders.





Amazon Fashion



Men's Fashion



Boys Clothing & Shoes




Women's Fashion



Girls Clothing & Shoes



Baby Clothing & Shoes





Ramen - Christmas 2016. The Best Deals.



Ad
 ·
Christmas2016.gratefulgoose.com



Christmas 2016. The Best Deals. Big Discounts This Black Friday.





Freezers



Digital Camera



Cookers




Ovens



Dishwasher



Microwave





Ramen - Christmas 2016. The Best Deals.



Ad
 ·
Christmas2016.doingup.com



Christmas 2016. The Best Deals. Big Discounts This Black Friday.





Freezers



Ovens



Digital Camera



Dishwasher




Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

Zoetis to Host Webcast and Conference Call on Third ...

https://www.aol.com/article/finance/2013/09/30/zoetis-to-host...


Zoetis to Host Webcast and Conference Call on Third-Quarter 2013 Financial Results FLORHAM PARK, N.J.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- Zoetis Inc. (NYS: ZTS) , formerly ...


FDA Underwhelms With Response to Super-Resistant ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/david-wallinga-md/fda-super-resistant...


The crème de la crème of public health agree: The infectious threat from super-resistant bacteria ... the Wall Street Journal asked Juan Rámon Alaix, ...


Zoetis™ Celebrates Initial Public Offering and First Day ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2013/02/01/zoetis-celebrates-initial...


Zoetis Chief Executive Officer Juan Ramon Alaix, joined by members of the Zoetis team, rings the NYSE Opening Bell to celebrate the company's IPO and first day of ...


NBC | AOL.com

https://www.aol.com/video/partner/nbc/518886504/591a414892fdde0c0d...


Zoetis CEO says new drug is a game-changer for treating pain in cats, dogs. Jim Cramer spoke with Juan Ramon Alaix, the CEO of animal health giant Zoetis, to get the ...


Independence Day: Zoetis Frees Itself From Pfizer - AOL ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2013/06/25/independence-day-zoetis...


Independence Day: Zoetis Frees Itself From Pfizer. ... "This is an historic day for Zoetis," said Zoetis CEO Juan Ramon Alaix in a ... Zoetis Frees Itself From Pfizer ...


Zoetis to Host Webcast and Conference Call on Second ...

https://www.aol.com/article/finance/2013/06/28/zoetis-to-host...


Chief Executive Officer Juan Ramón Alaix and Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Rick Passov will review second-quarter 2013 financial ...


Zoetis™ Reports First-Quarter 2013 Results - AOL Finance

https://www.aol.com/.../30/zoetis-reports-first-quarter-2013-results


Zoetis™ Reports First-Quarter 2013 Results First-Quarter 2013 Revenues of $1.09 Billion ... and companion animal health products," said Alaix.


Zoetis Becomes Fully Independent With Acceptance of Pfizer ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2013/06/24/zoetis-becomes-fully...


Zoetis Becomes Fully Independent With Acceptance of Pfizer Shares Tendered in Exchange Offer Names Michael McCallister as Non-Executive Chairman of the ...


Zoetis - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Zoetis


Juan Ramon Alaix : Revenue: US$ 4.8 billion (2014 ... The sell off of Zoetis is consistent with Pfizer's recent decision to shed other non-pharmaceuticals ...


Colegio San Ignacio, La Paz - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Colegio_San_Ignacio,_La_Paz


Colegio San Ignacio, La Paz, was founded by the Society of Jesus in 1963. It is coeducational, and offers six years of primary and six years of secondary education.










Alaix at Amazon - Shop hundreds of favorite brands.



Ad
 ·
Amazon.com/​fashion



Shop hundreds of favorite brands. Free Shipping on Qualified Orders.





Amazon Fashion



Men's Fashion



Boys Clothing & Shoes




Women's Fashion



Girls Clothing & Shoes



Baby Clothing & Shoes





Ramen - Christmas 2016. The Best Deals.



Ad
 ·
Christmas2016.gratefulgoose.com



Christmas 2016. The Best Deals. Big Discounts This Black Friday.





Freezers



Digital Camera



Cookers




Ovens



Dishwasher



Microwave





Ramen - Christmas 2016. The Best Deals.



Ad
 ·
Christmas2016.doingup.com



Christmas 2016. The Best Deals. Big Discounts This Black Friday.





Freezers



Ovens



Digital Camera



Dishwasher



12345Next
















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network














juan ramon alaix - WOW.com - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation

















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images




Reference


Reference




Searches related tojuan ramon alaix



juan ramon alaix net worth


zoetis ceo juan ramon alaix


zoetis


zoetis manufacturing sites



zoetis manufacturing locations


zoetis ceo


who owns zoetis


how to pronounce zoetis




Web Results

Juan Ramón Alaix | Zoetis | Zoetis

https://www.zoetis.com/about-us/executive-team/juan-ramon-alaix.aspx


Juan Ramón Alaix | Zoetis | Zoetis


Juan Ramón Alaix: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg

www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/person.asp?personId=...


Mr. Juan Ramón Alaix has been the Chief Executive Officer of Zoetis Inc. since July 2012. Mr. Alaix served as the President at Pfizer Animal Health Inc ...


Juan Ramón Alaix – Hispanic Executive

hispanicexecutive.com/2014/juan-ramon-alaix


Juan Ramón Alaix, CEO of Zoetis, positioned himself well for success.


Compensation Information for Juan Ramón Alaix , Chief ...

www1.salary.com/Juan-Ramón-Alaix-Salary-Bonus-Stock-Options-for...


Salary, bonuses, stock options, stock awards and other compensation for Juan Ramón Alaix , Chief Executive Officer at ZOETIS INC. How much did Juan Ramón Alaix make ...


Juan Ramon Alaix (Greater New York City Area) on LinkedIn

https://www.linkedin.com/in/juan-ramon-alaix-2756b3


View Juan Ramon Alaix’s professional profile on LinkedIn. LinkedIn is the world's largest business network, helping professionals like Juan Ramon Alaix discover ...


Juan Ramon Alaix - Montana AG Summit

https://www.agsummitmontana.com/juan-ramon-alaix


Juan Ramón Alaix is Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of Zoetis and will be one of the speakers at the 2017 Montana Ag Summit in Great Falls, MT.


Juan Ramón Alaix | Business Roundtable

businessroundtable.org/about/members/juan-ramón-alaix


Juan Ramón Alaix was appointed chief executive officer of Zoetis (formerly Pfizer Animal Health) in July 2012. In this role, he leads the world’s largest company ...


The Art of Disconnecting | Working Mother

www.workingmother.com/content/art-disconnecting


The Art of Disconnecting. ... CEO Juan Ramón Alaix has vowed not to send or respond to anything but an emergency message from Friday night through Sunday—and ...


Mr. Juan Ramon Alaix - Executive Bio & Compensation History

executives.findthecompany.com/l/300567/Mr-Juan-Ramon-Alaix


Find compensation and employment information for Mr. Juan Ramon Alaix (Zoetis), including salary, stock awards, and previous employers.


Zoetis CEO sees more future growth in treating pain for ...

www.cnbc.com/2017/05/15/zoetis-ceo-says-new-drug-is-a-game-changer...


Jim Cramer spoke with Juan Ramon Alaix, the CEO of animal health giant Zoetis, to get the latest on pet treatments.



Searches related tojuan ramon alaix



juan ramon alaix net worth


zoetis ceo juan ramon alaix


zoetis


zoetis manufacturing sites



zoetis manufacturing locations


zoetis ceo


who owns zoetis


how to pronounce zoetis




12345Next






Answers







Ramon A. Estella



Ramon A. Estella (1911 – 1991) was a pre-war movie director and actor. Filmography 1933 -Ang Punyal na Ginto (actor) 1938 -Bayan at Pag-ibig [Excelsior]...

more






Juan Ramon Sanchez



Juan Ramon Sanchez (born 1955) is a United States District Judge of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania....

more






Ramon Margalef Prize in Ecology



The Ramon Margalef Prize in Ecology is a prize awarded annually to recognize an exceptional scientific career or discovery in the field of ecology or...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | About our Ads
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Part of the AOL Search Network.








